






OPTEX |


















Skip to main content










 




Register A Project
Find Sales Rep
VMS
News
About
Contact
Employee
 




Request Project Layout
Download iPad App
Contact Sales or Support
 



Follow us on:

Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
 

 
 






Main menu

Home
Products
Find Distributor
Documentation
Case Studies
Videos
FAQ/Forum
 




Security
Integration
Entrance
Global
 

 

















SecurityWith indoor and outdoor detection options for every threat level, OPTEX provides you with flexibility and choice based on your perimeter-to-interior security needs. To find the right OPTEX motion detection solution for any application and environment, click here.
IntegrationBy integrating OPTEX IP detectors with IP network cameras and leading video management software, your perimeter security effectiveness rises dramatically. Click here to see how OPTEX IP sensors and detectors, along with strategic camera and VMS partners, can provide you with improved motion detection and increased reliability and effectiveness of your perimeter security.
EntranceOPTEX automatic door products not only make automatic doors safer, but also more responsive to natural human movement and therefore, allow the door to respond more naturally with its environment. To see the full line of OPTEX automatic door product, click here.
GlobalThe OPTEX Group's purpose is to contribute to society on a global scale by creating a secure, safe, and comfortable living environment. To access the OPTEX division in your country, click here.





 Find Products




Request A Layout




System Integrators




Contact Sales








      Total Security And Solutions Provider    

For over 35 years, OPTEX has established a worldwide reputation for quality, innovation, and technical excellence. We've learned that building a relationship and providing solutions to problems are more important than just selling a product. From our sales team, application engineers, technical support, and leadership teams - our organization is here to help you grow your business and solve your problems by phone, email, the web, and in person.Where can we go from here? How can we help take our relationship to the next level? What can we do to help? Let us design your project for you. In addition, we'd be happy to conduct trainings for your sales/installations teams or walk a job site for you. Please feel free to contact us directly with any questions, comments or concerns that come up, and let us take the next step in partnering with you.




      Find a Product    


Technology 
 - Any - Active InfraredLaserPassive InfraredPassive Infrared and Microwave


Wiring 
 - Any - WiredBattery PoweredPOE


Indoor/Outdoor 
 - Any - OutdoorIndoor



 



      Find a Distributor    


Select Region 
- Any -AsiaBrazilCanadaEuropeLatin AmericaUS - AlabamaUS - AlaskaUS - ArizonaUS - ArkansasUS - CaliforniaUS - ColoradoUS - ConnecticutUS - DelawareUS - District of ColumbiaUS - FloridaUS - GeorgiaUS - HawaiiUS - IdahoUS - IllinoisUS - IndianaUS - IowaUS - KansasUS - KentuckyUS - LouisianaUS - MaineUS - MarylandUS - MassachusettsUS - MichiganUS - MinnesotaUS - MississippiUS - MissouriUS - MontanaUS - NebraskaUS - NevadaUS - New HampshireUS - New JerseyUS - New MexicoUS - New YorkUS - North CarolinaUS - North DakotaUS - OhioUS - OklahomaUS - OregonUS - PennsylvaniaUS - Rhode IslandUS - South CarolinaUS - South DakotaUS - TennesseeUS - TexasUS - UtahUS - VermontUS - VirginiaUS - WashingtonUS - West VirginiaUS - WisconsinUS - Wyoming



 



      Find an Optex Sales Rep    


Select Region 
- Any -AsiaBrazilCanadaEuropeLatin AmericaUS - AlabamaUS - AlaskaUS - ArizonaUS - ArkansasUS - CaliforniaUS - ColoradoUS - ConnecticutUS - DelawareUS - District of ColumbiaUS - FloridaUS - GeorgiaUS - HawaiiUS - IdahoUS - IllinoisUS - IndianaUS - IowaUS - KansasUS - KentuckyUS - LouisianaUS - MaineUS - MarylandUS - MassachusettsUS - MichiganUS - MinnesotaUS - MississippiUS - MissouriUS - MontanaUS - NebraskaUS - NevadaUS - New HampshireUS - New JerseyUS - New MexicoUS - New YorkUS - North CarolinaUS - North DakotaUS - OhioUS - OklahomaUS - OregonUS - PennsylvaniaUS - Rhode IslandUS - South CarolinaUS - South DakotaUS - TennesseeUS - TexasUS - UtahUS - VermontUS - VirginiaUS - WashingtonUS - West VirginiaUS - WisconsinUS - Wyoming



 












  
 Optex IP detectors and sensors are now integrated with all leading video management software.  See how you can improve your VMS, IP video detection and surveillance. 



  
 Security should be more than just protection; It should be peace of mind as well. Achieve both with our wireless advance notification line.  



  
 Provide a site plan and Optex will custom build and pre-install photoelectric detectors in our Towers, all at no charge. We'll even ship them directly to the job site. 



  
 Drastically reduce labor cost and installation time by eliminating trenching and running wires.  



  
 Integrate Optex IP sensors into your VMS for enhanced video verification and full control of your perimeter security in all lighting conditions 








    1  





    2  





    3  





    4  





    5  






 



      The Latest from Optex    




 05/16/2017 - 12:20 
 OPTEX RLS-2020S Redscan "mini" Wins SIA New Product Showcase Award at ISC West  

 04/13/2017 - 11:23 
 Optex Wins the MVP (Most Valuable Product ) Award at ISC West 2017 for the FitLink  

 04/11/2017 - 12:22 
 The New I-Series Product Line and Brochure  

 12/14/2016 - 20:45 
 OPTEX releases new updated Beam and Enclosure guide  

 11/28/2016 - 08:16 
 OPTEX Launches Outdoor and High Resolution Indoor Laser Sensor RLS-2020S  

 05/19/2016 - 10:09 
 OPTEX announces new VP of Sales and Marketing  

 03/21/2016 - 12:59 
 OPTEX Launches New Generation of Indoor Laser Detector  

 11/16/2015 - 09:44 
 Why is OPTEX the Number One Choice for Battery-Powered, Wireless Perimeter Protection?  

 07/13/2015 - 08:28 
 OPTEX receives Platinum Stellar Service Award for Warranty Policies  

 03/04/2015 - 09:37 
 OPTEX to Replace the AX Series Long Range Photobeams with the New SL Series  

Pages12next ›last »


    more  

 







 
 

  






ECS Case - Shipping Containers, Rackmount Cases, Military Weapons Cases, Transit Cases, Custom Containers, COTS Containers, Footlockers, No Charge Engineering, Equipment Enclosures, Molded Cases, Fabricated Containers






















































JavaScript seem to be disabled in your browser.
You must have JavaScript enabled in your browser to utilize the functionality of this website.






ECS Case - Becklin Holdings, Inc. - protect



Contact Us
Portal
FAQs

Login










MILITARY AND COMMERCIAL CASE SOLUTIONS®      Manufacturer Direct - Call 541-476-8871


PRODUCT
ABOUT
RESOURCES
CUSTOM CASES
SHIPPING CASES
RACKMOUNT CASES
HOME



Browse by Category:

MILITARY
EMERGENCY RESPONSE
TECHNICAL EQUIPMENT
 AEROSPACE
TACTICAL















 



STACKING ADVANTAGE

Intelligent design,immediate availability,& undeniable customer support,Explore the vast 
array of sizes 
and configurations 
here.









 INVENTORY
SPECIAL

ECS Footlocker Cases 
at a discounted price! 

Perfect for storage, stowing
and camping.  
Order now >>







CERTIFICATIONS 

DUNS #059497768
NAICS Code: 326199
Cage Code: 24995
SBA #P0121064
Hub Zone Cert. #4157
ITAR Registered

Learn More >>



Featured Products
 Custom Cases 

 Rackmount Cases 

 Footlocker Cases 

 Single Lid Cases 


 Drawer Cases 

 Half Rack Cases 
  




Stay Connected with ECS Case







Sign up for monthly ECS newsletter






Call Today for Assistance541-476-8871



Company Overview
ECS offers a full line of factory direct shipping products as well as the most advanced custom packaging solutions available today. Commercial-off-the-shelf products include rackmount enclosures, medical cases, weapons solutions, shipping, storage, drawer, and footlocker cases available on demand. Military rackmount cases were invented by ECS in 1969, and we continue to set the bar for rackmount usability, compact design, and high performance. Our custom cases are second to none in terms of durability and security, and we can create a container for just about any product or application. Our Loadmaster® Rackmount cases stack with every previous rackmount model and all Loadmaster® Shipping Cases. Loadmaster® rotationally molded shipping cases are completely modular in all dimensions. Cases of different sizes securely stack and interlock together for maximum stacking efficiency. Loadmaster® cases are ideal for use on 463L military pallets. 
Learn More About ECS Case >>  




Rackmount Cases
Loadmaster® Rackmount
Legacy Rackmount

Carbon Fiber
Custom


Shipping Cases
Footlockers
Single Lid Cases
Drawer Cases
Platform Cases
Custom Cases


About
Contact
Staff
Sales Contact
Facilities
Terms & Conditions
Returns
Privacy


Resources
News
Product Documents
Videos
Trade Shows
Technical Bulletins
Request a Quote
Certifications and Affiliations
ECS Case Brochure


Certifications and Affiliations:











        All content copyright © 2016 Becklin Holdings, Inc. All right reserved   |      ISO 9000 Compliant    |       Patents Pending     |     US Patent 7,537,119/RE44/656 
		
All content copyright © ECS Case | Patent  7,587,119 applies to all Loadmaster™ Cases |  Patents Pending on all products
































OPTILED® - OPTILED Technologies - LED Lighting Solution, LED Lamp, LED Fixture for office, shop, interior design, hospital, advertising and other indoor and outdoor use





























 



                                 
                                English
                                 
                            

                                 
                                简体中文
                                 
                            

                                 
                                繁體中文
                                 
                            










































                            News ►
                        








                            Project Reference ►
                        








                            Products ►
                        




 



Copyright © 2017 OPTILED ® All Rights Reserved - System Support by TimeLink









E Ink │ Creativity on Display
























































































English
繁體中文
简体中文
日本語













Home
List2
List3





























 Contact Sales
At this time, we ask that you submit all entries in English.





*Company







*Title

--None--
CEO
President
Vice President
Director
Manager
Engineer
Creative Director
Designer
Project Manager
Product Manager







*First Name







*Last Name







*Region

--None--
North America
Europe
Asia
South America
Australia
Africa
Middle East
Caribbean
New Zealand
unknown







*Country Name

--None--
United States
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia-Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo, Democratic Republic of the (Zaire)
Congo, Republic of
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe (French)
Guam (USA)
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Holy See
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast (Cote D`Ivoire)
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique (French)
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia (French)
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Northern Mariana Islands
North Korea
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Island
Poland
Polynesia (French)
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent and Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Georgia and South Sandwich Islands
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen Islands
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Timor-Leste (East Timor)
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Wallis and Futuna Islands
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe







*State

--None--
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming
Other







*City







*Phone







*Email







*Website







*How did you hear about us

--None--
Advertisement
E Ink Blog
E Ink Research
Facebook / Twitter / LinkedIn
News Article
Purchased a Digikey Quick Start Kit
Referral
Tradeshow or Conference
Web Search







*Environmental Conditions for Application

--None--
Indoor Application
Outdoor Application
Both an Indoor & Outdoor Application







*Size Display Required

--None--
< 2"
2" < 5"
5" < 10"
10" < 14"
14" < 20"
20" < 52"
52" >







*Application

--None--
Architecture / Design
Automotive Display Panel
Aviation
Consumer Electronics
Electronic Badge
eReader
eTextbook or Educational Device
Fashion
GPS
Health & Medical Device
Home Automation System
Indoor Signage
Industrial
Information Display/Kiosk
Logistics & Shipping
Magazine Cover
Marine
Media Product
Military/ Govt
Mobile Device
Music Device- display sheet music
Outdoor Information Display
Outdoor Signage
Packaging Display/ Solution
Point-of-Purchase Display
Prism Film
Shelf Labels
Smartcards
Smart Watches (wearables)
Sports & Recreation Device
Tablet
Telecomm Product
Thermostat
Tools & Equipment
Watches & Clocks
White Boards
White Goods







Comments








 Email Opt Out
                                        





Reset
Submit









 







    
	CBOE | Chicago Board Options Exchange
    



























CLICK HERE TO LEARN MORE ABOUT THE CBOE + BATS INTEGRATION - C2 MIGRATION TIMELINE AVAILABLE




CBOE C2
CBOE Futures Exchange
CBOE Permit Holders
Livevol
Search



Login / Register




My Account
                                


Account Settings
                                        


Sign Out
                                        















TAP TO LEARN MORE ABOUT THE CBOE + BATS INTEGRATION - C2 MIGRATION TIMELINE AVAILABLE


CBOEExecute Success



Search
























  Loading...





VIX
      


CBOE
      


SPX
      


RUT
      


BXM
      






















































































Last
          
Change
          
%
          






                VIX
            



          10.35
        



          +0.07
        



          +0.68
        





                S&P 500
            



          2472.97
        



          -4.60
        



          -0.19
        





                RUSSELL 2000
            



          1409.8779
        



          -3.0255
        



          -0.21
        





                MSCI EMERGING MARKETS
            



          1063.66
        



          -6.31
        



          -0.59
        





                MSCI EAFE
            



          1955.52
        



          +3.01
        



          +0.15
        




Exchange Volume



CBOE:1002498



C2:131553


8/3/2017
CFE:70411


8/2/2017
CFE:280825



EXTENDED TRADING HOURS MICROSITE









CBOETV
        
see more CBOETV

















Trading Tools

Virtual Trading ToolsVirtual trading lets you practice your trades before you place them so you can test your strategies without risk.
Strategy Planning ToolsCBOE offers multiple comprehensive tools to help you plan your options trading strategies.
CalculatorsUse our options and margin calculators to gain insight into your trading strategies.
COBWebSM - The CBOE Complex Order Book on the WebGenerate the price and size of CBOE top-of-the-book resting complex spread orders in real-time.








    Options Blog
    
  







            Educational Tools
            
SEE ALL Tools






                Volatility Finder
              
The Volatility Finder scans for stocks and ETFs with volatility characteristics that may forecast upcoming price movement, or may identify under- or over-valued options in relation to a security's near- and longer-term price history to identify potential buying or selling opportunities.





                Volatility Optimizer
              
The Volatility Optimizer is a suite of free and premium option analysis services and strategy tools including the IV Index, an Options Calculator, a Strategist Scanner, a Spread Scanner, a Volatility Ranker, and more to identify potential trading opportunities and analyze market moves.





                Options Calculator
             
The Options Calculator powered by iVolatility.com is an educational tool intended to help individuals understand how options work and provides fair values and Greeks on any option using volatility data and delayed prices.





                Virtual Options Trading
              
The Virtual Trade Tool is a state-of-the-art tool designed to test your trading knowledge and lets you try new strategies or complex orders before putting your money on the line.





                paperTRADE
              
The paperTRADE tool is an easy-to-use, simulated trading system with sophisticated features including what-if and risk analysis, performance charts, easy spread creation using spreadMAKER, and multiple drag and drop customizations.










Special Offers
     
*Third Party Advertisements






            thinkorswim trade w/ advanced trading tools. Open an account and get up to $600! 
          






            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






            Trade free for 60 days on thinkorswim from TD Ameritrade.
 




            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






           New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 














CBOE News

    
        
VIEW ALL






*Third Party Advertisement













 



*Third Party Advertisement



*Third Party Advertisement




































     
    
	Volume Put Call Ratios
   


















































*Third Party Advertisement

 












CLICK HERE TO LEARN MORE ABOUT THE CBOE + BATS INTEGRATION - C2 MIGRATION TIMELINE AVAILABLE




CBOE C2
CBOE Futures Exchange
CBOE Permit Holders
Livevol
Search



Login / Register




My Account
                                


Account Settings
                                        


Sign Out
                                        















TAP TO LEARN MORE ABOUT THE CBOE + BATS INTEGRATION - C2 MIGRATION TIMELINE AVAILABLE


CBOEExecute Success



Search

















CBOE
DataCurrent Market StatisticsCBOE Holdings Monthly Volume & RPC ReportsHistorical Options DataCustomized Data ReportsMarket Data Express Real-Time ServiceHistorical Options DataHistorical Options DataLivevolLivevol Data ShopAnnual Market StatisticsIndex Settlement ValuesEquity Option VolumeVolume & Put/Call RatiosBuyWrite Index Roll Individual Index and ETF Volume Reports













CBOE Volume & Put/Call Ratios












CBOE Volume and Put/Call Ratio data is compiled for the convenience of site visitors and is furnished without responsibility for accuracy and is accepted by the site visitor on the condition that transmission or omissions shall not be made the basis for any claim, demand or cause for action.  The information and data was obtained from sources believed to be reliable, but accuracy is not guaranteed. Your use of CBOE Volume and Put/Call Ratio data is subject to the Terms and Conditions of CBOE Websites.Any questions about the data may be directed to the CBOE Help Desk at (866) 728-2263.Current:CBOE Total Exchange Volume and Put/Call Ratios (11-01-2006 to present)CBOE Index Volume and Put/Call Ratios (11-01-2006 to present)CBOE Equity Volume and Put/Call Ratios (11-01-2006 to present)CBOE Exchange Traded Product (ETPs) Volume and Put/Call Ratios (11-01-2006 to present)CBOE Volatility Index® (VIX®) Volume and Put/Call Ratios (2-24-2006 to present) Archive:CBOE Total Exchange Volume and Put/Call Ratios ArchiveCBOE Index Volume and Put/Call Ratios ArchiveCBOE Equity Volume and Put/Call Ratios ArchiveCBOE Total, Index, and Equity Put/Call Ratio Archive
(Total from 09-27-1995 to 12-31-2003, Index and Equity from 10-21-2003 to 12-31-2003)CBOE S&P 500 Index® (SPX®) Volume and Put/Call Ratio Archive






Related Links
        

Quotes & Data Main
Delayed Quotes
Delayed Quotes Classic
Monthly Volume & RPC Reports
Daily Market Statistics
Intra-day Volume
Index Settlements
Uncover Powerful Outcomes







*Third Party Advertisement










Special Offers
     
*Third Party Advertisements






            thinkorswim trade w/ advanced trading tools. Open an account and get up to $600! 
          






            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






            Trade free for 60 days on thinkorswim from TD Ameritrade.
 




            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






           New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 










*Third Party Advertisement













 



*Third Party Advertisement



*Third Party Advertisement




































  

 



Option (finance) - Wikipedia






















 






Option (finance)

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"Stock option" redirects here. For the employee incentive, see Employee stock option.


Financial markets







Public market
Exchange · Securities




Bond market




Bond valuation
Corporate bond
Fixed income
Government bond
High-yield debt
Municipal bond

Securitization




Stock market




Common stock
Preferred stock
Registered share
Stock

Stock certificate
Stock exchange




Other markets



Derivatives


(Credit derivative
Futures exchange
Hybrid security)



Foreign exchange


(Currency
Exchange rate)




Commodity
Money
Real estate
Reinsurance




Over-the-counter (off-exchange)





Forwards
Options




Spot market
Swaps





Trading




Participants
Regulation
Clearing house




Related areas




Banks and banking
Finance

corporate
personal
public









v
t
e





In finance, an option is a contract which gives the buyer (the owner or holder of the option) the right, but not the obligation, to buy or sell an underlying asset or instrument at a specific strike price on a specified date, depending on the form of the option. The strike price may be set by reference to the spot price (market price) of the underlying security or commodity on the day an option is taken out, or it may be fixed at a discount in a premium. The seller has the corresponding obligation to fulfill the transaction—to sell or buy—if the buyer (owner) "exercises" the option. An option that conveys to the owner the right to buy at a specific price is referred to as a call; an option that conveys the right of the owner to sell at a specific price is referred to as a put. Both are commonly used in and by the old traded, but the call option is more frequently discussed.
The seller may grant an option to a buyer as part of another transaction, such as a share issue or as part of an employee incentive scheme, otherwise a buyer would pay a premium to the seller for the option. A call option would normally be exercised only when the strike price is below the market value of the underlying asset, while a put option would normally be exercised only when the strike price is above the market value. When an option is exercised, the cost to the buyer of the asset acquired is the strike price plus the premium, if any. When the option expiration date passes without the option being exercised, then the option expires and the buyer would forfeit the premium to the seller. In any case, the premium is income to the seller, and normally a capital loss to the buyer.
The owner of an option may on-sell the option to a third party in a secondary market, in either an over-the-counter transaction or on an options exchange, depending on the option. The market price of an American-style option normally closely follows that of the underlying stock, being the difference between the market price of the stock and the strike price of the option. The actual market price of the option may vary depending on a number of factors, such as a significant option holder may need to sell the option as the expiry date is approaching and does not have the financial resources to exercise the option, or a buyer in the market is trying to amass a large option holding. The ownership of an option does not generally entitle the holder to any rights associated with the underlying asset, such as voting rights or any income from the underlying asset, such as a dividend.



Contents


1 History

1.1 Historical uses of options
1.2 Modern stock options


2 Contract specifications
3 Option trading

3.1 Forms of trading

3.1.1 Exchange-traded options
3.1.2 Over-the-counter options


3.2 Exchange trading
3.3 Basic trades (American style)

3.3.1 Long call
3.3.2 Long put
3.3.3 Short call
3.3.4 Short put


3.4 Option strategies


4 Types

4.1 According to the option rights
4.2 According to the underlying assets
4.3 Other option types
4.4 Option styles


5 Valuation overview
6 Valuation models

6.1 Black–Scholes
6.2 Stochastic volatility models


7 Model implementation

7.1 Analytic techniques
7.2 Binomial tree pricing model
7.3 Monte Carlo models
7.4 Finite difference models
7.5 Other models


8 Risks

8.1 Example
8.2 Pin risk
8.3 Counterparty risk


9 See also
10 References
11 Further reading



History[edit]
Historical uses of options[edit]
Contracts similar to options have been used since ancient times.[1] The first reputed option buyer was the ancient Greek mathematician and philosopher Thales of Miletus. On a certain occasion, it was predicted that the season's olive harvest would be larger than usual, and during the off-season, he acquired the right to use a number of olive presses the following spring. When spring came and the olive harvest was larger than expected he exercised his options and then rented the presses out at a much higher price than he paid for his 'option'.[2][3]
In London, puts and "refusals" (calls) first became well-known trading instruments in the 1690s during the reign of William and Mary.[4] Privileges were options sold over the counter in nineteenth century America, with both puts and calls on shares offered by specialized dealers. Their exercise price was fixed at a rounded-off market price on the day or week that the option was bought, and the expiry date was generally three months after purchase. They were not traded in secondary markets.
In the real estate market, call options have long been used to assemble large parcels of land from separate owners; e.g., a developer pays for the right to buy several adjacent plots, but is not obligated to buy these plots and might not unless he can buy all the plots in the entire parcel. Film or theatrical producers often buy the right — but not the obligation — to dramatize a specific book or script.
Lines of credit give the potential borrower the right — but not the obligation — to borrow within a specified time period.
Many choices, or embedded options, have traditionally been included in bond contracts. For example, many bonds are convertible into common stock at the buyer's option, or may be called (bought back) at specified prices at the issuer's option. Mortgage borrowers have long had the option to repay the loan early, which corresponds to a callable bond option.
Modern stock options[edit]
Options contracts have been known for decades. The Chicago Board Options Exchange was established in 1973, which set up a regime using standardized forms and terms and trade through a guaranteed clearing house. Trading activity and academic interest has increased since then.
Today, many options are created in a standardized form and traded through clearing houses on regulated options exchanges, while other over-the-counter options are written as bilateral, customized contracts between a single buyer and seller, one or both of which may be a dealer or market-maker. Options are part of a larger class of financial instruments known as derivative products, or simply, derivatives.[5][6]
Contract specifications[edit]
A financial option is a contract between two counterparties with the terms of the option specified in a term sheet. Option contracts may be quite complicated; however, at minimum, they usually contain the following specifications:[7]

whether the option holder has the right to buy (a call option) or the right to sell (a put option)[8]
the quantity and class of the underlying asset(s) (e.g., 100 shares of XYZ Co. B stock)
the strike price, also known as the exercise price, which is the price at which the underlying transaction will occur upon exercise
the expiration date, or expiry, which is the last date the option can be exercised
the settlement terms, for instance whether the writer must deliver the actual asset on exercise, or may simply tender the equivalent cash amount
the terms by which the option is quoted in the market to convert the quoted price into the actual premium – the total amount paid by the holder to the writer

Option trading[edit]
Forms of trading[edit]
Exchange-traded options[edit]
Exchange-traded options (also called "listed options") are a class of exchange-traded derivatives. Exchange traded options have standardized contracts, and in the United States are settled through a clearing house with fulfillment guaranteed by the Options Clearing Corporation (OCC). Since the contracts are standardized, accurate pricing models are often available. To understand which option is being traded a standardised option naming convention has been developed by the exchanges, that shows the expiry month and strike price using special letter codes. Exchange-traded options include:[9][10]

stock options
bond options and other interest rate options
stock market index options or, simply, index options and
options on futures contracts
callable bull/bear contract

Over-the-counter options[edit]
Over-the-counter options (OTC options, also called "dealer options") are traded between two private parties, and are not listed on an exchange. The terms of an OTC option are unrestricted and may be individually tailored to meet any business need. In general, the option writer is a well-capitalized institution (in order to prevent the credit risk). Option types commonly traded over the counter include:

interest rate options
currency cross rate options, and
options on swaps or swaptions.

By avoiding an exchange, users of OTC options can narrowly tailor the terms of the option contract to suit individual business requirements. In addition, OTC option transactions generally do not need to be advertised to the market and face little or no regulatory requirements. However, OTC counterparties must establish credit lines with each other, and conform to each other's clearing and settlement procedures.
With few exceptions,[11] there are no secondary markets for employee stock options. These must either be exercised by the original grantee or allowed to expire.
Exchange trading[edit]
The most common way to trade options is via standardized options contracts that are listed by various futures and options exchanges. [12] Listings and prices are tracked and can be looked up by ticker symbol. By publishing continuous, live markets for option prices, an exchange enables independent parties to engage in price discovery and execute transactions. As an intermediary to both sides of the transaction, the benefits the exchange provides to the transaction include:

fulfillment of the contract is backed by the credit of the exchange, which typically has the highest rating (AAA),
counterparties remain anonymous,
enforcement of market regulation to ensure fairness and transparency, and
maintenance of orderly markets, especially during fast trading conditions.

Basic trades (American style)[edit]
These trades are described from the point of view of a speculator. If they are combined with other positions, they can also be used in hedging. An option contract in US markets usually represents 100 shares of the underlying security.[13][14]
Long call[edit]




Payoff from buying a call.


A trader who expects a stock's price to increase can buy a call option to purchase the stock at a fixed price ("strike price") at a later date, rather than purchase the stock outright. The cash outlay on the option is the premium. The trader would have no obligation to buy the stock, but only has the right to do so at or before the expiration date. The risk of loss would be limited to the premium paid, unlike the possible loss had the stock been bought outright.
The holder of an American style call option can sell his option holding at any time until the expiration date, and would consider doing so when the stock's spot price is above the exercise price, especially if he expects the price of the option to drop. By selling the option early in that situation, the trader can realise an immediate profit. Alternatively, he can exercise the option — for example, if there is no secondary market for the options — and then sell the stock, realising a profit. A trader would make a profit if the spot price of the shares rises by more than the premium. For example, if the exercise price is 100 and premium paid is 10, then if the spot price of 100 rises to only 110 the transaction is break-even; an increase in stock price above 110 produces a profit.
If the stock price at expiration is lower than the exercise price, the holder of the options at that time will let the call contract expire and only lose the premium (or the price paid on transfer).

Long put[edit]




Payoff from buying a put.


A trader who expects a stock's price to decrease can buy a put option to sell the stock at a fixed price ("strike price") at a later date. The trader will be under no obligation to sell the stock, but only has the right to do so at or before the expiration date. If the stock price at expiration is below the exercise price by more than the premium paid, he will make a profit. If the stock price at expiration is above the exercise price, he will let the put contract expire and only lose the premium paid. In the transaction, the premium also plays a major role as it enhances the break-even point. For example, if exercise price is 100, premium paid is 10, then a spot price of 100 to 90 is not profitable. He would make a profit if the spot price is below 90.
It is important to note that one who exercises a put option, does not necessarily need to own the underlying asset. Specifically, one does not need to own the underlying stock in order to sell it. The reason for this is that one can short sell that underlying stock.

Short call[edit]




Payoff from writing a call.


A trader who expects a stock's price to decrease can sell the stock short or instead sell, or "write", a call. The trader selling a call has an obligation to sell the stock to the call buyer at a fixed price ("strike price"). If the seller does not own the stock when the option is exercised, he is obligated to purchase the stock from the market at the then market price. If the stock price decreases, the seller of the call (call writer) will make a profit in the amount of the premium. If the stock price increases over the strike price by more than the amount of the premium, the seller will lose money, with the potential loss being unlimited.

Short put[edit]




Payoff from writing a put.


A trader who expects a stock's price to increase can buy the stock or instead sell, or "write", a put. The trader selling a put has an obligation to buy the stock from the put buyer at a fixed price ("strike price"). If the stock price at expiration is above the strike price, the seller of the put (put writer) will make a profit in the amount of the premium. If the stock price at expiration is below the strike price by more than the amount of the premium, the trader will lose money, with the potential loss being up to the strike price minus the premium. A benchmark index for the performance of a cash-secured short put option position is the CBOE S&P 500 PutWrite Index (ticker PUT).

Option strategies[edit]
Main article: Option strategies




Payoffs from buying a butterfly spread.






Payoffs from selling a straddle.






Payoffs from a covered call.


Combining any of the four basic kinds of option trades (possibly with different exercise prices and maturities) and the two basic kinds of stock trades (long and short) allows a variety of options strategies. Simple strategies usually combine only a few trades, while more complicated strategies can combine several.
Strategies are often used to engineer a particular risk profile to movements in the underlying security. For example, buying a butterfly spread (long one X1 call, short two X2 calls, and long one X3 call) allows a trader to profit if the stock price on the expiration date is near the middle exercise price, X2, and does not expose the trader to a large loss.

An Iron condor is a strategy that is similar to a butterfly spread, but with different strikes for the short options – offering a larger likelihood of profit but with a lower net credit compared to the butterfly spread.


Selling a straddle (selling both a put and a call at the same exercise price) would give a trader a greater profit than a butterfly if the final stock price is near the exercise price, but might result in a large loss.
Similar to the straddle is the strangle which is also constructed by a call and a put, but whose strikes are different, reducing the net debit of the trade, but also reducing the risk of loss in the trade.


One well-known strategy is the covered call, in which a trader buys a stock (or holds a previously-purchased long stock position), and sells a call. If the stock price rises above the exercise price, the call will be exercised and the trader will get a fixed profit. If the stock price falls, the call will not be exercised, and any loss incurred to the trader will be partially offset by the premium received from selling the call. Overall, the payoffs match the payoffs from selling a put. This relationship is known as put-call parity and offers insights for financial theory. A benchmark index for the performance of a buy-write strategy is the CBOE S&P 500 BuyWrite Index (ticker symbol BXM).


Another very common strategy is the protective put, in which a trader buys a stock (or holds a previously-purchased long stock position), and buys a put. This strategy acts as an insurance when investing on the underlying stock, hedging the investor's potential loses, but also shrinking an otherwise larger profit, if just purchasing the stock without the put. The maximum profit of a protective put is theoretically unlimited as the strategy involves being long on the underlying stock. The maximum loss is limited to the purchase price of the underlying stock less the strike price of the put option and the premium paid. A protective put is also known as a married put.
Types[edit]
Options can be classified in a few ways.
According to the option rights[edit]

Call options give the holder the right—but not the obligation—to buy something at a specific price for a specific time period.
Put options give the holder the right—but not the obligation—to sell something at a specific price for a specific time period.

According to the underlying assets[edit]

Equity option
Bond option
Future option
Index option
Commodity option
Currency option

Other option types[edit]
Another important class of options, particularly in the U.S., are employee stock options, which are awarded by a company to their employees as a form of incentive compensation. Other types of options exist in many financial contracts, for example real estate options are often used to assemble large parcels of land, and prepayment options are usually included in mortgage loans. However, many of the valuation and risk management principles apply across all financial options. There are two more types of options; covered and naked.[15]
Option styles[edit]
Main article: Option style
Options are classified into a number of styles, the most common of which are:

American option – an option that may be exercised on any trading day on or before expiration.
European option – an option that may only be exercised on expiry.

These are often described as vanilla options. Other styles include:

Bermudan option – an option that may be exercised only on specified dates on or before expiration.
Asian option – an option whose payoff is determined by the average underlying price over some preset time period.
Barrier option – any option with the general characteristic that the underlying security's price must pass a certain level or "barrier" before it can be exercised.
Binary option – An all-or-nothing option that pays the full amount if the underlying security meets the defined condition on expiration otherwise it expires.
Exotic option – any of a broad category of options that may include complex financial structures.[16]

Valuation overview[edit]
Options valuation is a topic of ongoing research in academic and practical finance. In basic terms, the value of an option is commonly decomposed into two parts:

The first part is the intrinsic value, which is defined as the difference between the market value of the underlying, and the strike price of the given, option
The second part is the time value, which depends on a set of other factors which, through a multi-variable, non-linear interrelationship, reflect the discounted expected value of that difference at expiration.

Although options valuation has been studied at least since the nineteenth century, the contemporary approach is based on the Black–Scholes model which was first published in 1973.[17][18]
Valuation models[edit]
Main article: Valuation of options
The value of an option can be estimated using a variety of quantitative techniques based on the concept of risk neutral pricing and using stochastic calculus. The most basic model is the Black–Scholes model. More sophisticated models are used to model the volatility smile. These models are implemented using a variety of numerical techniques.[19] In general, standard option valuation models depend on the following factors:

The current market price of the underlying security,
the strike price of the option, particularly in relation to the current market price of the underlying (in the money vs. out of the money),
the cost of holding a position in the underlying security, including interest and dividends,
the time to expiration together with any restrictions on when exercise may occur, and
an estimate of the future volatility of the underlying security's price over the life of the option.

More advanced models can require additional factors, such as an estimate of how volatility changes over time and for various underlying price levels, or the dynamics of stochastic interest rates.
The following are some of the principal valuation techniques used in practice to evaluate option contracts.
Black–Scholes[edit]
Main article: Black–Scholes
Following early work by Louis Bachelier and later work by Robert C. Merton, Fischer Black and Myron Scholes made a major breakthrough by deriving a differential equation that must be satisfied by the price of any derivative dependent on a non-dividend-paying stock. By employing the technique of constructing a risk neutral portfolio that replicates the returns of holding an option, Black and Scholes produced a closed-form solution for a European option's theoretical price.[20] At the same time, the model generates hedge parameters necessary for effective risk management of option holdings. While the ideas behind the Black–Scholes model were ground-breaking and eventually led to Scholes and Merton receiving the Swedish Central Bank's associated Prize for Achievement in Economics (a.k.a., the Nobel Prize in Economics),[21] the application of the model in actual options trading is clumsy because of the assumptions of continuous trading, constant volatility, and a constant interest rate. Nevertheless, the Black–Scholes model is still one of the most important methods and foundations for the existing financial market in which the result is within the reasonable range.[22]
Stochastic volatility models[edit]
Main article: Heston model
Since the market crash of 1987, it has been observed that market implied volatility for options of lower strike prices are typically higher than for higher strike prices, suggesting that volatility is stochastic, varying both for time and for the price level of the underlying security. Stochastic volatility models have been developed including one developed by S.L. Heston.[23] One principal advantage of the Heston model is that it can be solved in closed-form, while other stochastic volatility models require complex numerical methods.[23]
See also: SABR Volatility Model
Model implementation[edit]
Further information: Valuation of options
Once a valuation model has been chosen, there are a number of different techniques used to take the mathematical models to implement the models.
Analytic techniques[edit]
In some cases, one can take the mathematical model and using analytical methods develop closed form solutions such as Black–Scholes and the Black model. The resulting solutions are readily computable, as are their "Greeks". Although the Roll-Geske-Whaley model applies to an American call with one dividend, for other cases of American options, closed form solutions are not available; approximations here include Barone-Adesi and Whaley, Bjerksund and Stensland and others.
Binomial tree pricing model[edit]
Main article: Binomial options pricing model
Closely following the derivation of Black and Scholes, John Cox, Stephen Ross and Mark Rubinstein developed the original version of the binomial options pricing model.[24][25] It models the dynamics of the option's theoretical value for discrete time intervals over the option's life. The model starts with a binomial tree of discrete future possible underlying stock prices. By constructing a riskless portfolio of an option and stock (as in the Black–Scholes model) a simple formula can be used to find the option price at each node in the tree. This value can approximate the theoretical value produced by Black Scholes, to the desired degree of precision. However, the binomial model is considered more accurate than Black–Scholes because it is more flexible; e.g., discrete future dividend payments can be modeled correctly at the proper forward time steps, and American options can be modeled as well as European ones. Binomial models are widely used by professional option traders. The Trinomial tree is a similar model, allowing for an up, down or stable path; although considered more accurate, particularly when fewer time-steps are modelled, it is less commonly used as its implementation is more complex.
Monte Carlo models[edit]
Main article: Monte Carlo methods for option pricing
For many classes of options, traditional valuation techniques are intractable because of the complexity of the instrument. In these cases, a Monte Carlo approach may often be useful. Rather than attempt to solve the differential equations of motion that describe the option's value in relation to the underlying security's price, a Monte Carlo model uses simulation to generate random price paths of the underlying asset, each of which results in a payoff for the option. The average of these payoffs can be discounted to yield an expectation value for the option.[26] Note though, that despite its flexibility, using simulation for American styled options is somewhat more complex than for lattice based models.
Finite difference models[edit]
Main article: Finite difference methods for option pricing
The equations used to model the option are often expressed as partial differential equations (see for example Black–Scholes equation). Once expressed in this form, a finite difference model can be derived, and the valuation obtained. A number of implementations of finite difference methods exist for option valuation, including: explicit finite difference, implicit finite difference and the Crank-Nicholson method. A trinomial tree option pricing model can be shown to be a simplified application of the explicit finite difference method. Although the finite difference approach is mathematically sophisticated, it is particularly useful where changes are assumed over time in model inputs – for example dividend yield, risk free rate, or volatility, or some combination of these – that are not tractable in closed form.
Other models[edit]
Other numerical implementations which have been used to value options include finite element methods. Additionally, various short rate models have been developed for the valuation of interest rate derivatives, bond options and swaptions. These, similarly, allow for closed-form, lattice-based, and simulation-based modelling, with corresponding advantages and considerations.
Risks[edit]
As with all securities, trading options entails the risk of the option's value changing over time. However, unlike traditional securities, the return from holding an option varies non-linearly with the value of the underlying and other factors. Therefore, the risks associated with holding options are more complicated to understand and predict.
In general, the change in the value of an option can be derived from Itō's lemma as:







d
C
=
Δ
d
S
+
Γ



d

S

2



2


+
κ
d
σ
+
θ
d
t



{\displaystyle dC=\Delta dS+\Gamma {\frac {dS^{2}}{2}}+\kappa d\sigma +\theta dt\,}





where the Greeks 



Δ


{\displaystyle \Delta }

, 



Γ


{\displaystyle \Gamma }

, 



κ


{\displaystyle \kappa }

 and 



θ


{\displaystyle \theta }

 are the standard hedge parameters calculated from an option valuation model, such as Black–Scholes, and 



d
S


{\displaystyle dS}

, 



d
σ


{\displaystyle d\sigma }

 and 



d
t


{\displaystyle dt}

 are unit changes in the underlying's price, the underlying's volatility and time, respectively.
Thus, at any point in time, one can estimate the risk inherent in holding an option by calculating its hedge parameters and then estimating the expected change in the model inputs, 



d
S


{\displaystyle dS}

, 



d
σ


{\displaystyle d\sigma }

 and 



d
t


{\displaystyle dt}

, provided the changes in these values are small. This technique can be used effectively to understand and manage the risks associated with standard options. For instance, by offsetting a holding in an option with the quantity 



−
Δ


{\displaystyle -\Delta }

 of shares in the underlying, a trader can form a delta neutral portfolio that is hedged from loss for small changes in the underlying's price. The corresponding price sensitivity formula for this portfolio 



Π


{\displaystyle \Pi }

 is:







d
Π
=
Δ
d
S
+
Γ



d

S

2



2


+
κ
d
σ
+
θ
d
t
=
Γ



d

S

2



2


+
κ
d
σ
+
θ
d
t



{\displaystyle d\Pi =\Delta dS+\Gamma {\frac {dS^{2}}{2}}+\kappa d\sigma +\theta dt=\Gamma {\frac {dS^{2}}{2}}+\kappa d\sigma +\theta dt\,}





Example[edit]
A call option expiring in 99 days on 100 shares of XYZ stock is struck at $50, with XYZ currently trading at $48. With future realized volatility over the life of the option estimated at 25%, the theoretical value of the option is $1.89. The hedge parameters 



Δ


{\displaystyle \Delta }

, 



Γ


{\displaystyle \Gamma }

, 



κ


{\displaystyle \kappa }

, 



θ


{\displaystyle \theta }

 are (0.439, 0.0631, 9.6, and −0.022), respectively. Assume that on the following day, XYZ stock rises to $48.5 and volatility falls to 23.5%. We can calculate the estimated value of the call option by applying the hedge parameters to the new model inputs as:







d
C
=
(
0.439
⋅
0.5
)
+

(
0.0631
⋅



0.5

2


2


)

+
(
9.6
⋅
−
0.015
)
+
(
−
0.022
⋅
1
)
=
0.0614


{\displaystyle dC=(0.439\cdot 0.5)+\left(0.0631\cdot {\frac {0.5^{2}}{2}}\right)+(9.6\cdot -0.015)+(-0.022\cdot 1)=0.0614}





Under this scenario, the value of the option increases by $0.0614 to $1.9514, realizing a profit of $6.14. Note that for a delta neutral portfolio, whereby the trader had also sold 44 shares of XYZ stock as a hedge, the net loss under the same scenario would be ($15.86).
Pin risk[edit]
Main article: Pin risk
A special situation called pin risk can arise when the underlying closes at or very close to the option's strike value on the last day the option is traded prior to expiration. The option writer (seller) may not know with certainty whether or not the option will actually be exercised or be allowed to expire. Therefore, the option writer may end up with a large, unwanted residual position in the underlying when the markets open on the next trading day after expiration, regardless of his or her best efforts to avoid such a residual.
Counterparty risk[edit]
A further, often ignored, risk in derivatives such as options is counterparty risk. In an option contract this risk is that the seller won't sell or buy the underlying asset as agreed. The risk can be minimized by using a financially strong intermediary able to make good on the trade, but in a major panic or crash the number of defaults can overwhelm even the strongest intermediaries.
See also[edit]

American Stock Exchange
Chicago Board Options Exchange
Dilutive security
Eurex
Euronext.liffe
International Securities Exchange
NYSE Arca
Philadelphia Stock Exchange
LEAPS (finance)
Real options analysis
PnL Explained
Pin risk (options)

References[edit]


^ Abraham, Stephan (May 13, 2010). "History of Financial Options - Investopedia". Investopedia. Retrieved Jun 2, 2014. 
^ Mattias Sander. Bondesson's Representation of the Variance Gamma Model and Monte Carlo Option Pricing. Lunds Tekniska Högskola 2008
^ Aristotle. Politics.
^ Smith, B. Mark (2003), History of the Global Stock Market from Ancient Rome to Silicon Valley, University of Chicago Press, p. 20, ISBN 0-226-76404-4 
^ Brealey, Richard A.; Myers, Stewart (2003), Principles of Corporate Finance (7th ed.), McGraw-Hill, Chapter 20 
^ Hull, John C. (2005), Options, Futures and Other Derivatives (excerpt by Fan Zhang) (6th ed.), Pg 6: Prentice-Hall, ISBN 0-13-149908-4 
^ Characteristics and Risks of Standardized Options (PDF), Options Clearing Corporation, retrieved June 21, 2007 
^ Dr. Alan Ellman (October 5, 2014). "The “Moneyness” Of Call And Put Options: Understanding Strike Prices". Investing.com. Retrieved 15 March 2017. 
^ Trade CME Products, Chicago Mercantile Exchange, retrieved June 21, 2007 
^ ISE Traded Products, International Securities Exchange, archived from the original on May 11, 2007, retrieved June 21, 2007 
^ Elinor Mills (December 12, 2006), Google unveils unorthodox stock option auction, CNet, retrieved June 19, 2007 
^ Harris, Larry (2003), Trading and Exchanges, Oxford University Press, pp.26–27 
^ invest-faq or Law & Valuation for typical size of option contract
^ "Understanding Stock Options" (PDF). The Options Clearing Corporation and CBOE. Retrieved 27 August 2015. 
^ Lawrence G. McMillan (15 February 2011). McMillan on Options. John Wiley & Sons. pp. 575–. ISBN 978-1-118-04588-6. 
^ Fabozzi, Frank J. (2002), The Handbook of Financial Instruments (Page. 471) (1st ed.), New Jersey: John Wiley and Sons Inc, ISBN 0-471-22092-2 
^ Benhamou, Eric. "Options pre-Black Scholes" (PDF). [unreliable source?]
^ Black, Fischer; Scholes, Myron (1973). "The Pricing of Options and Corporate Liabilities". Journal of Political Economy. 81 (3): 637–654. JSTOR 1831029. doi:10.1086/260062. 
^ Reilly, Frank K.; Brown, Keith C. (2003), Investment Analysis and Portfolio Management (7th ed.), Thomson Southwestern, Chapter 23 
^ Black, Fischer and Myron S. Scholes. "The Pricing of Options and Corporate Liabilities," Journal of Political Economy, 81 (3), 637–654 (1973).
^ Das, Satyajit (2006), Traders, Guns & Money: Knowns and unknowns in the dazzling world of derivatives (6th ed.), London: Prentice-Hall, Chapter 1 'Financial WMDs – derivatives demagoguery,' p.22, ISBN 978-0-273-70474-4 
^ Hull, John C. (2005), Options, Futures and Other Derivatives (6th ed.), Prentice-Hall, ISBN 0-13-149908-4 
^ a b Jim Gatheral (2006), The Volatility Surface, A Practitioner's Guide, Wiley Finance, ISBN 978-0-471-79251-2 
^ Cox JC, Ross SA and Rubinstein M. 1979. Options pricing: a simplified approach, Journal of Financial Economics, 7:229–263.[1]
^ Cox, John C.; Rubinstein, Mark (1985), Options Markets, Prentice-Hall, Chapter 5 
^ Crack, Timothy Falcon (2004), Basic Black–Scholes: Option Pricing and Trading (1st ed.), pp. 91–102, ISBN 0-9700552-2-6 


Further reading[edit]

Fischer Black and Myron S. Scholes. "The Pricing of Options and Corporate Liabilities," Journal of Political Economy, 81 (3), 637–654 (1973).
Feldman, Barry and Dhuv Roy. "Passive Options-Based Investment Strategies: The Case of the CBOE S&P 500 BuyWrite Index." The Journal of Investing, (Summer 2005).
Reilly, Frank and Keith C. Brown, Investment Analysis and Portfolio Management, 7th edition, Thompson Southwestern, 2003, pp. 994–5.
Schneeweis, Thomas, and Richard Spurgin. "The Benefits of Index Option-Based Strategies for Institutional Portfolios" The Journal of Alternative Investments, (Spring 2001), pp. 44 – 52.
Whaley, Robert. "Risk and Return of the CBOE BuyWrite Monthly Index" The Journal of Derivatives, (Winter 2002), pp. 35 – 42.
Bloss, Michael; Ernst, Dietmar; Häcker Joachim (2008): Derivatives – An authoritative guide to derivatives for financial intermediaries and investors Oldenbourg Verlag München ISBN 978-3-486-58632-9







v
t
e


Derivatives market




Derivative (finance)



Options





Terms




Credit spread
Debit spread
Exercise
Expiration
Moneyness
Open interest
Pin risk
Risk-free interest rate
Strike price
the Greeks
Volatility






Vanilla options




Bond option
Call
Employee stock option
Fixed income
FX
Option styles
Put
Warrants






Exotic options




Asian
Barrier
Basket
Binary
Chooser
Cliquet
Commodore
Compound
Forward start
Interest rate
Lookback
Mountain range
Rainbow
Swaption






Combinations




Collar
Covered call
Fence
Iron butterfly
Iron condor
Straddle
Strangle
Protective put
Risk reversal






Spreads




Back
Bear
Box
Bull
Butterfly
Calendar
Diagonal
Intermarket
Ratio
Vertical






Valuation




Binomial
Black
Black–Scholes model
Finite difference
Garman-Kohlhagen
Margrabe's formula
Put–call parity
Simulation
Real options valuation
Trinomial
Vanna–Volga pricing








Swaps



Amortising
Asset
Basis
Conditional variance
Constant maturity
Correlation
Credit default
Currency
Dividend
Equity
Forex
Forward Rate Agreement
Inflation
Interest rate
Overnight indexed
Total return
Variance
Volatility
Year-on-Year Inflation-Indexed
Zero Coupon Inflation-Indexed
Zero Coupon Swap








Forwards
Futures






Contango
Currency future
Dividend future
Forward market
Forward price
Forwards pricing
Forward rate
Futures pricing
Interest rate future
Margin
Normal backwardation
Single-stock futures
Slippage
Stock market index future





Exotic derivatives



Energy derivative
Freight derivative
Inflation derivative
Property derivative
Weather derivative





Other derivatives



Collateralized debt obligation (CDO)
Constant proportion portfolio insurance
Contract for difference
Credit-linked note (CLN)
Credit default option
Credit derivative
Equity-linked note (ELN)
Equity derivative
Foreign exchange derivative
Fund derivative
Interest rate derivative
Mortgage-backed security
Power reverse dual-currency note (PRDC)





Market issues



Consumer debt
Corporate debt
Government debt
Great Recession
Municipal debt
Tax policy









Authority control



NDL: 00575313










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Option_(finance)&oldid=787431392"					
Categories: Options (finance)Contract lawHidden categories: All articles lacking reliable referencesArticles lacking reliable references from August 2013Use mdy dates from August 2014 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


AfrikaansAzərbaycancaBân-lâm-gúБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎БългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFrançais한국어ՀայերենHrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתҚазақшаLëtzebuergeschLietuviųMagyarМакедонскиമലയാളംМонголNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålNorsk nynorskOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаភាសាខ្មែរPolskiPortuguêsРусскийСрпски / srpskiSuomiSvenskaதமிழ்Татарча/tatarçaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаTiếng Việt粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 25 June 2017, at 10:53.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






    
	Virtual Trading Tools
   


















































*Third Party Advertisement

 












CLICK HERE TO LEARN MORE ABOUT THE CBOE + BATS INTEGRATION - C2 MIGRATION TIMELINE AVAILABLE




CBOE C2
CBOE Futures Exchange
CBOE Permit Holders
Livevol
Search



Login / Register




My Account
                                


Account Settings
                                        


Sign Out
                                        















TAP TO LEARN MORE ABOUT THE CBOE + BATS INTEGRATION - C2 MIGRATION TIMELINE AVAILABLE


CBOEExecute Success



Search

















CBOE
Trading ToolsVirtual Trading ToolsStrategy Planning ToolsCalculatorsCOBWebVirtual Trading ToolsVirtual Trading ToolsVirtual TradepaperTRADE













Virtual Trading Tools












Virtual TradeOur original virtual trade tool has many features to help make you a better options trader.Key FeaturesVirtually trade stocks, options, spreads, straddles and covered call trades.Experiment with advanced order strategies like triggers and one-cancels-other (OCO).Get quotes at any time from any screen using our integrated quote window.Analyze your performance thoroughly by downloading your positions.Free live chat support is available to help whenever you need it.Click here to learn more and start practicing your trades now.






Related Links
        

Intra-Day Volume
Options Calculator
CBOE TV
Strategies
Uncover Powerful Outcomes







*Third Party Advertisement










Special Offers
     
*Third Party Advertisements






            thinkorswim trade w/ advanced trading tools. Open an account and get up to $600! 
          






            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






            Trade free for 60 days on thinkorswim from TD Ameritrade.
 




            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






           New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 










*Third Party Advertisement













 



*Third Party Advertisement



*Third Party Advertisement




































  

 







PerkinElmer | For The Better | Home

















































CORPORATE
LAB PRODUCTS & SERVICES




Contact Us




                            Welcome (Login/Register)

                    








 





































Toggle navigation






































For People, For the Planet, For the Better


Our innovative detection, imaging, informatics, and service capabilities help customers and consumers transform data into informed decisions that accelerate insights to better protect our environment, our food supply and the health of our families.

                                See How
                                    
                            
















                            AMRI/PerkinElmer Collaboration Is Advancing Precision Medicine
                        



                Two years after forming a strategic collaboration AMRI and PerkinElmer are helping to eliminate research and clinical data silos and advance precision medicine.
            













                            Single Cell ICP-MS Presents Hope For More Effective Ovarian Cancer Treatments
                        



                PerkinElmer’s NexION 2000 Single Cell ICP-MS has the ability to detect metal in a single ovarian cancer cell, which will lead to new cancer strategies and therapies.
            













                            Battling Sickle Cell Disease At Its Source
                        



                Sub-Saharan Africa has the highest percentage of births with sickle cell disease. Dr. Russell E. Ware and PerkinElmer are collaborating to train African medical technicians to conduct SCD screening on their own.
            













                            A Better Way to Target Pesticides in Berries
                        



                With the use of potentially harmful pesticides to protect berry crops on the rise, PerkinElmer introduces unique ways to detect and quantify pesticide residue in fruit.
            












                        It Starts with a Mission
                    






The challenges we face today have never been greater. Our mission is to help you detect environmental threats, ensure food quality and safety, diagnose and treat disease earlier, develop drugs and therapies faster and analyze information to unlock new insights for a better tomorrow.








                        Upcoming Events
                    







Aug


            4
        



    PerkinElmer New Product Introduction







Aug


            20
        
             -
            
                24
            



    254th American Chemical Society National Meeting & Exposition







Sep


            17
        
             -
            
                21
            



    HUPO 16th Annual Work Congress (HUPO2017)







Sep


            17
        
             -
            
                20
            



    CE Pharm 2017




 



 








                                More Stories
                                
                            








                            Social Hub
                        








Facebook





Google +





Linked In





Twitter





You Tube












                        Capabilities
                        
                    



Detection, imaging, laboratory services, and informatics solutions serving the needs of scientists, clinicians, and patients.





Detection

Technologies to support the detection and identification of disease, organic and inorganic analytes, and biological pathways.




Imaging

Imaging technologies to visualize from simple to complex disease, cellular, biological, and chemical events.




Informatics

Informatics and software platforms providing visualization, efficient workflow, data management, and analytics that yield relevant information to drive decisions.




Services

Multi-vendor laboratory services, next generation sequencing, custom labeling and assay development, clinical lab testing, and unparalleled customer support to ensure smooth results.











                        Markets
                        
                    



Our solutions in the areas of Diagnostics, Life Sciences, and Applied Markets help scientists, lab professionals, and clinicians answer important questions needed to help customers gain earlier and more accurate insights to improve lives and the world around us.





Diagnostics

Solutions to help enable a proactive approach to healthcare and better outcomes for patients.




Life Sciences

Solutions to accelerate drug, biotherapeutic, disease, and pathology research.




Applied Markets

Solutions that provide insights on the quality of air, water, food, and materials to help ensure the safety of entire communities.





















    NOTICE: You are now leaving the PerkinElmer website.  The privacy policy of the site to which you are going may differ from PerkinElmer's privacy policy. To remain at the PerkinElmer site and return to your previous page, click the button Cancel.  To leave the PerkinElmer site for the link you selected, click the button OK.
    

OK
Cancel






  Privacy






















 











Privacy Policy
Last Updated: August 29, 2016
Bloomberg L.P. and its affiliates (together, “Bloomberg”) respects the privacy rights of our users and is strongly committed to protecting your privacy. This Privacy Policy applies to this Web site, any newsletters subscribed to via this Web site, information collected and provided to Bloomberg when you subscribe to the digital edition of Bloomberg Businessweek at third-party websites and applications, and information collected offline when you subscribe to the print edition of Bloomberg Businessweek, but does not apply to any other products or services or to information collected in any other way (whether offline or online) by Bloomberg, unless expressly indicated by Bloomberg (such as by including a link to this Privacy Policy on other Bloomberg websites or on Bloomberg mobile applications).
Collection and Use of Personal Information
Bloomberg or a designated service provider collects personal information that you voluntarily provide on this Web site, on third-party websites and applications when subscribing to the digital edition of Bloomberg Businessweek, or offline in connection with your Bloomberg Businessweek print edition subscription, which may include your name, address, e-mail address, credit card number, billing information, etc. For example, Bloomberg or a designated service provider collects personal information when you register on this Web site, request certain Bloomberg services or products, or submit the information to enter a sweepstakes, contest, or other promotion.
Do not provide information about others unless you are authorized to do so and consent to have all information used, disclosed, and transferred in accordance with this Privacy Policy. By submitting the information about others, you represent and warrant that you are authorized to do so and that you have received authorization from the person about whom you are providing the information and that person has consented to have all information used, disclosed, and transferred in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
This information is used to provide you your requested service or product, to communicate with you, and enforce any terms of service or agreement related to this Web site. We use any credit card or payment information we acquire from you to fulfill your order. Bloomberg may use your personal information to provide you with information, special offers, and promotions via various means including e-mail. You may instruct Bloomberg at any time not to use your personal information covered by this Privacy Policy to provide you with special offers and promotions by clicking here or, if you are Bloomberg Businessweek subscriber, by clicking on the Bloomberg Businessweek Opt-out form. You can also update your settings for receiving offers and promotions by email by clicking here. Your choice does not apply to any other Bloomberg products or services to which you may subscribe or purchase. Please note that if you exercise choice in this manner, you will continue to receive communications concerning your account and products and services you requested, and in response to any requests for information by you. Please also note that this opt-out process may take some time to complete, consistent with applicable law.
Bloomberg or a designated service provider takes photographs for security purposes and for inclusion the People directory on the Bloomberg Professional service, which is available to Bloomberg users worldwide.
Use of Cookies and Other Electronic Tools
Bloomberg and the parties with whom we work (e.g., service providers, business partners, advertisers and advertising servers) may place, view, and/or use “cookies”, Web server logs, Web beacons, or other electronic tools to collect statistical and other information about your use of this Web site and other websites. This information may include information about the IP address of your computer, browser type, language, operating system, your mobile device, geo-location data, the state or country from which you accessed this Web site, the Web pages visited, the date and the time of a visit, the websites you visited immediately before and after visiting this Web site, the number of links you click within this Web site, the functions you use on this Web site, the databases you view and the searches you request on this Web site, the data you save on or download from this Website and the number of times you view an advertisement.
Bloomberg and the parties with whom we work may use the information collected for various reasons, either on behalf of Bloomberg or for the other parties’ own purposes, including research, analysis, to better serve visitors to this Web site (such as by enabling log-in, providing access to certain sections of this Web site, providing customized content, or presenting online advertising on this Web site or other websites tailored to your interests as described further below), to compile aggregate and anonymous information about usage of this Web site and other websites, other statistics, etc. However, if you have deleted and disabled cookies, these uses will not be possible to the extent they are based on cookie information. To opt out of Google Analytics, including Demographics and Interest Reporting, please click here. To opt out of Parse.ly analytics, please click here.
To assist us with the uses described in this Privacy Policy, information collected about your use of this Web site or other websites may be combined with personal or other information about you from other online or offline sources. If you prefer that we not combine non-personal information that has been collected, through cookies, about your use of this Web site or other websites with personal or other information about you, then please delete and disable cookies for each browser, on each computer you use to surf the Web.
Most browsers are set to accept cookies by default. If you prefer, you can usually set your browser to disable cookies, or to alert you when cookies are being sent. Likewise, most mobile devices allow you to disable the ability for geo-location information to be collected from your mobile device. The help function on most browsers and mobile devices contains instructions on how to set your browser to notify you before accepting cookies, disable cookies entirely, or disable the collection of geo-location data. You need to set each browser, on each device you use to surf the Web. Thus, if you use multiple browsers (e.g., Chrome, Safari, Internet Explorer, Firefox, etc.), you should repeat this procedure with each one. Similarly, if you connect to the Web from multiple devices (e.g., work and home), you need to set each browser on each device. However, if you disable cookies or refuse to accept a request to place a cookie, it is possible that some parts of this Web site, such as the polls, surveys, contests, and product sales, and certain areas of the Web site for which you need to log in, will not function properly, and the advertising you receive when you visit this Web site may not be advertisements tailored to your interests.

Advertisements
Bloomberg, its designated service providers, or third-party advertisers or their advertising servers may also place or recognize unique cookies on your computer or use other electronic tools in order to help display advertisements that you see on this Web site or on other websites. Information about your visits to, and activity on, this Web site and other websites, an IP address, the number of times you have viewed an advertisement, and other such usage information is used, alone or in combination with other information, to display on your device screen advertisements that may be of particular interest to you. We may use Web beacons, provided by third-party advertising companies, to help manage and optimize our online advertising and product performance. Web beacons enable us to recognize a browser’s cookie when a browser visits this Web site, and to learn which banner ads bring users to this Web site. The use and collection of your information by these third-party service providers, and third-party advertisers and their advertising servers is not covered by this Privacy Policy. BLP adheres to the industry’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising located here. To “opt out” of advertising cookies placed by participating companies in the Self-Regulatory Program for Online Behavioral Advertising, and thereby limit the tracking of your online activity and the targeted advertising you receive, please click here. To “opt out” of advertising cookies placed by the Network Advertising Initiative’s (“NAI”) online behavioral advertising member networks, and thereby limit the tracking of your online activity and the targeted advertising you receive, please click here. To opt out of advertising cookies for Your Online Choices if you are based in the EU, please click here.
Bloomberg’s designated service providers assist Bloomberg with advertisement display functions and related analytics for this Web site. For a list of these designated service providers and more information about their anonymous information collection and use practices, please click here. To opt out of Google Analytics for Display Advertising, please click here.
Note that even if you exercise choice for targeted advertising, you will still receive online advertising.
Disclosure of Personal Information and Other Information
Bloomberg may share your personal and other information with our affiliates (including affiliated websites under common ownership or control) and designated service providers. Bloomberg may share with other third parties information about our Web site users, such as your use of this Web site or other websites, and the services provided on this Web site or other websites, but only on an anonymous and aggregate basis. Bloomberg may also share your personal information (excluding security photographs) with a sponsor or other third party (“Third-Party Provider”) that provides you with special offers or promotions that may be of interest to you. You may instruct Bloomberg at any time not to share your personal information covered by this Privacy Policy with such Third-Party Providers by clicking here or, if you are Bloomberg Businessweek subscriber, by clicking on the Bloomberg Businessweek Opt-out form. Please note that (i) this opt-out process may take some time to complete, consistent with applicable law; and (ii) even after such opt-out process is completed, your personal and other information may continue to be shared with our affiliates (including affiliated websites under common ownership or control) and designated service providers.
If you participate in certain features of this Web site (e.g., sharing news stories of interest), please note that any information you or others voluntarily disclose through use of these features, becomes available to the public and/or other users whom you have designated. If you choose to provide access to designated individuals, please be aware that any information you post will be visible to such individuals for their use. Bloomberg is not responsible for the information that you or others choose to disclose publicly on this Web site, and neither Bloomberg’s nor others’ use of such information is subject to this Privacy Policy.
Bloomberg may also disclose your personal and other information to unaffiliated third parties if we believe in good faith that such disclosure is necessary: (a) to comply with the law or in response to a subpoena, court order, or other legal process, subject to Bloomberg’s Law Enforcement Data Request Statement; (b) to protect the interests, rights, safety, or property of Bloomberg or others; (c) to enforce any terms of service on this Web site; (d) to provide you and other users of this Web site with the services or products requested by you and/or the other users (including allowing a purchaser of Bloomberg or a Bloomberg division to continue to serve you), and to perform other activities related to such services and products, including billing and collection; (e) to provide you with special offers or promotions from Bloomberg that may be of interest to you; or (f) to operate Bloomberg’s systems properly.
The collection, further use, and/or disclosure of your information by Third-Party Providers or by other third parties is not the responsibility of Bloomberg. Rather, such collection, use, and/or disclosure is governed by the third parties’ privacy policies.
Accuracy and Security of Personal Information
Any personal information you provide to Bloomberg is kept on secure servers. Bloomberg uses reasonable administrative, technical, personnel, and physical measures (a) to safeguard personal information against loss, theft, unauthorized use, disclosure, or modification; and (b) to ensure the integrity of the personal information. To help us protect your privacy, you should maintain the secrecy of the logon ID and password you may have set up in connection with your participation in this Web site’s service.
Accessing and Updating Your Personal Information
To access, review, rectify, or delete your personal information covered by this Privacy Policy, please contact us by clicking here. While Bloomberg will make reasonable efforts to accommodate your request, we also reserve the right to impose certain restrictions and requirements on such access requests, if allowed or required by applicable laws.
Transfer of Personal Information To Other Countries
Some of the uses and disclosures mentioned in this Privacy Policy may involve the transfer and processing of your personal information to and in various countries around the world that may have different levels of privacy protection than your country. By submitting your personal information, you consent to such transfers and processing, including to and in the United States. Bloomberg’s Intra-Group Personal Data Protection Statement provides additional information about the transfer of personal information from the EU, EEA, and Switzerland to the United States and is available here.
Links To Third-Party Websites
Bloomberg may provide links to third-party websites, including social networking websites. Since we do not control third-party sites and are not responsible for any information you may provide while on such sites, we encourage you to read the privacy policies on those websites before providing any of your information on such sites.
Questions Regarding This Privacy Policy
If you have questions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us by clicking here and choosing the Other category. Please include “Privacy” in the Subject line of your inquiry.
Your California Privacy Rights
If you are a California resident, California Civil Code Section 1798.83 permits you to request information regarding the disclosure of your personal information by Bloomberg L.P. to its affiliates and/or third parties for their direct marketing purposes.
To make such a request, please send an email with your first name, last name, mailing address, email address and telephone number to privacy@bloomberg.com. Please include “California Privacy Rights” in the Subject line of your email.
You may also make such a request by writing to us at:
Bloomberg L.P.
Attn: Legal Department
731 Lexington Avenue
New York, NY 10022
Modifications To This Privacy Policy
Bloomberg reserves the right to change this Privacy Policy at any time by posting revisions on this Web page. Such changes will be effective upon posting.
















NEXT|GROUP HOLDINGS - A Financial Technology Comany-



































NEXT | GROUP HOLDINGS
LIVE YOUR MOBILE LIFESTYLE















Focused, Diverse, Disruptive.





		                        NEXT| GROUP HOLDINGS INC. maintains a technology portfolio spanning multiple verticals. We innovate and market disruptive technology for the unbanked and underserved.
		                    





LONG DISTANCE CALLING

 



PREPAID CARDS & REMMITENCES

 




PREPAID MOBILE & DATA

 




MOBILE BANKING

 




HD VIDEO & TELEPRESENCE

 




		                       Next Group Holdings Inc is a technology company which focuses on offering enhanced mobility solutions to the unbanked, under-served, and emerging markets. The company primarily operates through its subsidiaries: NEXT | CALA, a general purpose reloadable Visa Card, NXT | GN, a provider of a multipoint HD video platform and NEXT | MOBILE360, a provider of mobile voice, text, and data services. The company's mission is to enable a mobile lifestyle for everyone by providing a 360 integrated mobile experience and mobile banking solution. NGH operates under the slogan “ Live your mobile lifestyle.”.       
		                    









Our business units





NEXT | CALA

		                           NEXT|CALA, is the company’s flagship product. NEXTCALA powers both the company’s mobile banking solution and reward program(s). The card is a safe and cost-effective alternative to carrying cash. NEXTCALA cards are acceptable wherever Visa debit cards are accepted and can be used for all transactions, including withdrawing cash, sending cash, checking balance at ATMs, and making purchases at retail locations, online, or over the phone. 

Learn More





NEXT | MOBILE 360

		    		            NEXT|MOBILE360 is a prepaid MVNO, leveraging sprint’s network, offering voice, text, and data services as well as international calling at affordable rates. In February 2013, the company bought STI Mobile and rebranded it as Next Mobile 360. Our unique infrastructure enabling it to earn above-average profits even at competitive rates. Next Mobile 360 is the only MVNO that offers free long distance calling minutes and exclusive partnerships with the NEXTCALA and NEXTCALA Rewards.
		                        
Learn More





NXT | GN

		                           NXT|GN  in cooperation with industry leader Cisco Systems, developed in 2012 a unique product called AVYDA powered by Telarix, an HD telepresence platform that allows millions of people to connect using their mobile phones, tablets and PCs into celebrities, talents, healthcare and education applications on both Android and iOS operating systems. AVYDA allows HD video conferences to connect point-to-multipoint, having 10,000 concurrent calls per session border control (SBC).
		                           

Learn More










NEXT | GROUP HOLDINGS PRESS RELEASES




July 22, 2016



Next Group Holdings Announces Completion of the Transaction for Acquisition of Accent Intermedia (AIM), a Program Manager for Financial Stored Value Solutions

MIAMI, July 22, 2016 /PRNewswire/ --
Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) (the "Company") today announces that it has signed definitive Agreements with Dean Keatin Marketing, LLC ("DKM"), which completes the transaction to acquire a controlling interest (64% of shares) in Accent Intermedia LLC ("AIM"). AIM is a successful Stored Value Program Manager that has generated over $1 Billion of stored value activations through its PCI Compliant system and has been the go to FinTech (Financial Technology vertical) solution for the Internet Retailer 500.
AIM provides the support infrastructure that allows national brands to host Closed Loop (Gift Card) and Open Loop (Prepaid Debit / General Purpose Reload) card programs. AIM has developed its own in-house fraud prevention tool that reduces "card not present" fraud to less than 1%.
AIM currently provides infrastructure and program services to Harley Davidson, AMC Theatres, Super Valu, Applebee's, IHOP and other industry leading companies.
"I am pleased to complete the AIM acquisition. We promised in early January 2016 that we would acquire several strategic companies to make NXGH the leader in the Mobile Banking market. We are proving NXGH to be a unique value proposition in the Mobile Banking space. This acquisition allows NXGH to have two independent banks under our NEXTCALA & AIM agreements, respectively. This gives NXGH the diversity to secure its footprint as a force to be reckoned with, in the global financial market," said Arik Maimon, NXGH's Chairman and CEO.  
"NXGH, together with its proprietary financial technology and its next generation HD Video platform AVYDA will revolutionize the customer service experience and our rewards program for our growing Financial services customers. This will change the traditional way companies have been communicating for the past several decades and will improve and modernize the collaborative customer service experience," said Dennis Varghese Principal & Managing Director of DKM. "After AIM being in business for over 10 years, I am proud to see AIM integrate with NXGH, a leader in next generation financial services for the consumers that adapt their banking services with mobile video banking," added Varghese.
"The AIM acquisition is an important cornerstone that strengthens the NXGH foundation now and in the future. AIM's decade strong propriety technology solution will help expedite NXGH's execution as a Program Manager for Stored Value products including Prepaid Gift Cards, General Purpose Reloadable (GPR) card programs and verticals," said Michael De Prado NXGH's President & COO. "AIM's data facility is highly secure and has redundant infrastructure services with a "zero single point of failure infrastructure", multiple power grid supplies, 24/7/365 monitored infrastructure, multi-tiered support, intrusion detection and loss prevention systems. AIM's data facility will help us prepare, and fortify the upcoming 2016 prepaid gift card holiday season and revenues," added De Prado.
About Us: NXGH is a corporation headquartered in Miami, Florida, which, through its operating subsidiaries, engages in the business of using proprietary technology and certain licensed technology to provide innovative mobile banking, mobility, and telecommunications solutions to underserved, unbanked, and emerging markets. NXGH's principal executive offices are located at 1111 Brickell Avenue, Suite 2200, Miami, Florida 33131, and its telephone number at that location is (800) 611-3622. NXGH's web address is http://www.nextgroupholdings.com.
THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAINS "FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS", AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 27A OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, AND SECTION 21E OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED. STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE, WHICH ARE NOT PURELY HISTORICAL, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS AND INCLUDE ANY STATEMENTS REGARDING BELIEFS, PLANS, EXPECTATIONS OR INTENTIONS REGARDING THE FUTURE. EXCEPT FOR THE HISTORICAL INFORMATION PRESENTED HEREIN, MATTERS DISCUSSED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAIN FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS THAT ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES THAT COULD CAUSE ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM ANY FUTURE RESULTS, PERFORMANCE OR ACHIEVEMENTS EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED BY SUCH STATEMENTS. STATEMENTS THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, INCLUDING STATEMENTS THAT ARE PRECEDED BY, FOLLOWED BY, OR THAT INCLUDE SUCH WORDS AS"ESTIMATE", "ANTICIPATE", "BELIEVE", "PLAN" OR "EXPECT" OR SIMILAR STATEMENTS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE INCLUDE STATEMENTS RELATING TO OTHER PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION REGARDING THE COMPANY.
Contact:
NEXT Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) Telephone: +1-800-611-3622,info@nextgroupholdings.com  




July 19, 2016


Next Group Holdings Announces Final Record Date of July 22, 2016 for Special Dividend

Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) (the "Company") today announced that it has received final clearance from FINRA with respect to its recently announced special stock dividend and the final record date for the dividend will now be July 22, 2016.
Now that the final record date has been set and cleared with FINRA, shareholders should obtain interim statements from their brokers as of the final July 22, 2016 record date. Those shareholders that have already submitted their interim statements to the Company, based on the previous June 28, 2016 record date, will need to request another interim statement from their broker based on the final record date and also resubmit that statement to the Company.
For our shareholders' convenience, and to assist the Company in processing the dividend, we have posted to the "Investor Relations" section of the Company's website (http://www.nextgroupholdings.com) a "Shareholder Transmittal Letter," which each shareholder should use when transmitting to the Company their interim statement as of the final dividend record date. The Shareholder Transmittal Letter should be completed and signed by the shareholder and then returned to the Company, along with the attached interim account statement, by email or fax as indicated in the Shareholder Transmittal Letter. A form letter that can be used by shareholders to request their interim statement from their broker, as of the final July 22, 2016 record date, is also posted in the Investor Relation section of the Company's website.
Shareholders with any questions regarding the dividend can reach the Company by email at dividend@nextgroupholdings.com, by fax at (305)-647-6497 or by telephone at 800-550-9055.




Jun 09, 2016


Next Group Holdings Agrees to Acquire Tel3 from Arik Maimon

MIAMI, June 9, 2016 /PRNewswire/ - Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) announced today that it has signed an agreement with Arik Maimon, who serves as NXGH's CEO and Chairman, under which, subject to the receipt of a fairness opinion from an independent expert on such transactions, NXGH will acquire the telecom marketing brand "Tel3" together with the assets and client database of Tel3 from Mr. Maimon.  NXGH's Board of Directors approved the transaction unanimously and expects to close the acquisition of Tel3 by June 20, 2016.
Tel3 is a marketing group that had revenues over $3 million in 2015 with 31.5% gross margin, 25,000 active customers, and a database of 300,000 current and former clients. 
Mr. Maimon, who recently acquired Tel3 from a third party, has agreed to sell Tel3 to NXGH on substantially similar terms to the terms of the transaction under which he personally acquired the Tel3 assets, subject to the fairness opinion, a unanimous vote in favor of the transaction by all disinterest members of NXGH's board, and other regulatory considerations. 
"I believe that NXGH's acquisition of Tel3 will provide great value and substantial benefits to NXGH and its shareholders, as this deal will bring us a significant new revenue stream, additional profits and a large new customer base', said Michael De Prado, President and COO of NXGH. "This is a major step forward that will enhance NXGH's position in the markets for its telecommunications and its financial products", added De Prado.
NXGH plans to offer enhanced financial and telecom services and products to those Tel3 customers that opt-In to receive special offers and rewards based on their daily use of NEXTCALA and M&M Telecom offerings. 
NEXTCALA financial products will provide attractive pricing and extra benefits to unbanked and underbanked consumers.  Rewards programs will also help to lower costs and improve lifestyle and family connections.
NXGH, through its wholly owned subsidiary, Meimoun & Mammon LLC (which does business as M & M Telecom) expects to increase the revenue streams that were historically achieved by Tel3.  M & M Telecom has had FCC 214 "Common Carrier" Authority since 2011, and is a contributor to the FCC Universal Service Fund. As a result of NXGH's acquisition of Tel3, M & M Telecom will be able to offer and provide extra services, benefits and rewards to customers. 
"NXGH's acquisition of Tel3 assets will represent a major step forward to help us develop M & M Telecom into a major telecom provider and bring NEXTCALA to the forefront in the everyday financial solutions markets," said Arik Maimon, NXGH's chairman and CEO. "We believe that bringing Tel3 under the umbrella of M & M Telecom will produce significant revenue growth and profitability for NXGH."
About Us: NXGH is a corporation headquartered in Miami, Florida, which, through its operating subsidiaries, engages in the business of using proprietary technology and certain licensed technology to provide innovative mobile banking, mobility, and telecommunications solutions to underserved, unbanked, and emerging markets. NXGH's principal executive offices are located at 1111 Brickell Avenue, Suite 2200, Miami, Florida 33131, and its telephone number at that location is (800) 611-3622. NXGH's web address is www.nextgroupholdings.com.
THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAINS "FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS", AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 27A OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, AND SECTION 21E OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED. STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE, WHICH ARE NOT PURELY HISTORICAL, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS AND INCLUDE ANY STATEMENTS REGARDING BELIEFS, PLANS, EXPECTATIONS OR INTENTIONS REGARDING THE FUTURE. EXCEPT FOR THE HISTORICAL INFORMATION PRESENTED HEREIN, MATTERS DISCUSSED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAIN FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS THAT ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES THAT COULD CAUSE ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM ANY FUTURE RESULTS, PERFORMANCE OR ACHIEVEMENTS EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED BY SUCH STATEMENTS. STATEMENTS THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, INCLUDING STATEMENTS THAT ARE PRECEDED BY, FOLLOWED BY, OR THAT INCLUDE SUCH WORDS AS"ESTIMATE", "ANTICIPATE", "BELIEVE", "PLAN" OR "EXPECT" OR SIMILAR STATEMENTS ARE FORWARD-
LOOKING STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE INCLUDE STATEMENTS RELATING TO OTHER PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION REGARDING THE COMPANY.
SOURCE  Next Group Holdings, Inc.




Jun 08, 2016


Next Group Holdings Subsidiary, NEXTCALA Signs Joint Venture Agreement with Glocal Payment Solutions, Inc.


Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) announced today that its subsidiary, NEXTCALA, Inc. ("NEXTCALA") signed an agreement with Glocal Payment Solutions, Inc. ("GLOCAL"), to form a Joint Venture to be named NextGlocal that will provide financial solutions to the underbanked population.
The NextGlocal financial products will provide attractive pricing and extra benefits to unbanked and underbanked consumers.
NEXTCALA will make available to the Joint Venture every feature of NEXTCALA's prepaid card financial services program platform, including without limitation, its standard GPR (General Purpose Reload) features, functions, and support, co-branded and customized for GLOCAL's business and consumer customers through a distinct NextGlocal co-branding program to meet demand created by NextGlocal.
GLOCAL is a multi-media commerce payment solutions company engaged in creating and sustaining a state-of-the-art payment processing solution and network that encompasses a wide range of participating suppliers, incentives, and affinity across multiple business and consumer network groups.  GLOCAL will expand its ongoing successes in the travel and tourism, health and travel insurance, restaurant and retail, corporate solutions and non-profit business segments in the United States and in soon-to-be-announced international markets.  GLOCAL, together with its existing engagements, will enable NextGlocal to target a universal sample space of 30,000,000 users from the launch of the Pilot Program in June 2016, transitioning into the potential universal sample space of 100,000,000 users globally through year three.
"The synergy and common objectives between NEXTCALA and GLOCAL will enable the Joint Venture to develop new market segments that have a distinct need and hunger for NEXTCALA's financial solutions," said Arik Maimon, NXGH's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer.  "We believe that creating this Joint Venture will produce significant market penetration, revenue growth, and profitability for NXGH."
"This is an exciting and a natural evolution in our efforts to sustain a comprehensive, multi-media payments and settlement, rewards platform for our suppliers and customers.  NEXTCALA will impart the critical components needed for GLOCAL to harness and sustain a constantly evolving payment and settlement platform," said Sudhan Thomas, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of GLOCAL.  Mr. Thomas has been appointed Chief Executive Officer of the NextGlocal Joint Venture and will run its day-to-day operations.
"I believe this is a very good strategy for NXGH as this Joint Venture should provide great value and substantial benefits to NXGH and its shareholders," said Michael De Prado, President and Chief Operating Officer of NXGH.  "This is a significant step forward that will enhance NXGH's position in the markets for its financial products and shareholders," added Mr. DePrado.
"We are excited about the launch of the NextGlocal Joint Venture and look forward to deploying all of the Glocal assets to the success of the Joint Venture," said Paul Appel, ESQ, President and Chief Operating Officer of GLOCAL.
NXGH owns 94% of the issued and outstanding shares of NEXTCALA, which is one of its four operating subsidiaries.  NXGH will own 60% of the Joint Venture entity and GLOCAL will own 40%.
About Us: NXGH is a corporation headquartered in Miami, Florida, which, through its operating subsidiaries, engages in the business of using proprietary technology and certain licensed technology to provide innovative mobile banking, mobility, and telecommunications solutions to underserved, unbanked, and emerging markets. NXGH's principal executive offices are located at 1111 Brickell Avenue, Suite 2200, Miami, Florida 33131, and its telephone number at that location is (800) 611-3622. NXGH's web address is www.nextgroupholdings.com.
THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAINS "FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS", AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 27A OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, AND SECTION 21E OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED. STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE, WHICH ARE NOT PURELY HISTORICAL, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS AND INCLUDE ANY STATEMENTS REGARDING BELIEFS, PLANS, EXPECTATIONS OR INTENTIONS REGARDING THE FUTURE. EXCEPT FOR THE HISTORICAL INFORMATION PRESENTED HEREIN, MATTERS DISCUSSED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAIN FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS THAT ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES THAT COULD CAUSE ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM ANY FUTURE RESULTS, PERFORMANCE OR ACHIEVEMENTS EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED BY SUCH STATEMENTS. STATEMENTS THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, INCLUDING STATEMENTS THAT ARE PRECEDED BY, FOLLOWED BY, OR THAT INCLUDE SUCH WORDS AS"ESTIMATE", "ANTICIPATE", "BELIEVE", "PLAN" OR "EXPECT" OR SIMILAR STATEMENTS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE INCLUDE STATEMENTS RELATING TO OTHER PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION REGARDING THE COMPANY.
SOURCE  Next Group Holdings, Inc.




Jun 03, 2016


Corrected Press Release Regarding Next Group Holdings Inc.'s Announcement of Schedule for Release of NEXTCALA Mobile Apps, Correcting and Clarifying Certain Information about NEXTCALA Visa Prepaid Cards and about InComm and Others


MIAMI, June 3, 2016 /PRNewswire/ - Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) announced today that it is withdrawing its press release dated February 10, 2016, which was titled "Next Group Holdings Announces Schedule for Release of NEXTCALA Mobile Apps", and that it is modifying and correcting the withdrawn press release of February 10, 2016, with the following information: 
Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) announced today that it plans to release its NEXTCALA mobile applications for both Android and iOS in June 2016, through its subsidiary NEXTCALA, Inc. ("NEXTCALA") in partnership with InComm. NXGH owns 94% of the issued and outstanding shares of NEXTCALA, which is one of NXGH's four operating subsidiaries. 
NEXTCALA promotes and distributes the NEXTCALA Visa® Prepaid Card under licensing and operating agreements with prepaid industry-leader InComm and The Bancorp Bank pursuant to a license from Visa U.S.A. Inc. The Bancorp Bank; Member FDIC. 
NEXTCALA Card cardholders can quickly load cash, $20-$500, to their NEXTCALA Card at thousands of Vanilla Reload retail locations nationwide including 7-Eleven, CVS, Dollar General, Family Dollar, Rite Aid, Speedway, Walgreens and Walmart. Cardholders can also establish direct deposit to automatically load their payroll, government benefits or tax refund to their NEXTCALA Card. The NEXTCALA Card can be used wherever Visa debit cards are accepted for ATM withdrawals, bill payments, and purchasing at retail locations, online, and over the phone. 
The NEXTCALA mobile application will give users access to account services 24/7/365. Users will be able to check their card balance, view transactions, and find Vanilla Reload locations. Plus, users will also earn points that can be redeemed towards long distance calls either via voice or HD Video. 
About Us: Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) is a corporation headquartered in Miami, Florida, which, through its operating subsidiaries, engages in the business of using proprietary technology and certain licensed technology to provide innovative mobile banking, mobility, and telecommunications solutions to underserved, unbanked, and emerging markets. NXGH's principal executive offices are located at 1111 Brickell Avenue, Suite 2200, Miami, Florida 33131, and its telephone number at that location is (800) 611-3622. NXGH's web address is nextgroupholdings.com. 
About InCommLeveraging deep integrations into retailers' point-of-sale systems, InComm provides connectivity to a variety of service providers that allow consumers to conduct everyday business at more than 450,000 points of retail distribution worldwide. Whether those consumers are activating prepaid products, paying bills, enjoying real-time discounts through a membership card, purchasing digital goods in-store or adding funds to an online account, InComm is there to provide unique gift-gifting opportunities, cater to on-the-go shoppers, deliver added value through loyalty programs and serve cash-based consumers. With 186 global patents, InComm is headquartered in Atlanta with a presence in over 30 countries in North and South America, Europe and the Asia-Pacific region. 
THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAINS "FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS", AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 27A OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, AND SECTION 21E OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED. STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE, WHICH ARE NOT PURELY HISTORICAL, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS AND INCLUDE ANY STATEMENTS REGARDING BELIEFS, PLANS, EXPECTATIONS OR INTENTIONS REGARDING THE FUTURE. EXCEPT FOR THE HISTORICAL INFORMATION PRESENTED HEREIN, MATTERS DISCUSSED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAIN FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS THAT ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES THAT COULD CAUSE ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM ANY FUTURE RESULTS, PERFORMANCE OR ACHIEVEMENTS EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED BY SUCH STATEMENTS. STATEMENTS THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, INCLUDING STATEMENTS THAT ARE PRECEDED BY, FOLLOWED BY, OR THAT INCLUDE SUCH WORDS AS"ESTIMATE", "ANTICIPATE", "BELIEVE", "PLAN" OR "EXPECT" OR SIMILAR STATEMENTS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE INCLUDE STATEMENTS RELATING TO OTHER PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION REGARDING THE COMPANY. 
SOURCE  Next Group Holdings, Inc.




June 2, 2016


Adiv Baruch Joins Board of Directors of Next Group Holdings


MIAMI, June 2, 2016 /PRNewswire/ - Next Group Holdings, Inc. ("NXGH") announced today that Adiv Baruch, a leading entrepreneur and investor in the Israeli high tech sector, has been elected to the board of directors of NXGH.
Mr. Baruch serves as Chairman of Jerusalem Technology Investments Ltd. ("JTI"), which is engaged in the business of identifying, investing in, and mentoring emerging software and medical devices technology companies. JTI is a publicly-traded company whose shares are listed on the Tel-Aviv Stock Exchange.  He also currently serves as Chairman of Maayan Ventures, a platform for investments in innovative technology companies, as President of Nyotron, a global cyber technology company, and as Chairman of Covertix, whose patented technology delivers real-time, non-invasive control, protection, and tracking of confidential files.  
"Adiv is a tremendous leader and we are excited to welcome him to the board of directors of Next Group Holdings," said Arik Maimon, Chairman and CEO of NXGH.  "We believe his strong experience in high-tech solutions and in the management of rapid growth will be extremely valuable as Next Group Holdings launches its innovative new products."
"In addition to his experience in high tech, Adiv's experience in both finance and corporate governance will be invaluable to us as we grow Next Group Holdings and navigate the public capital markets," said Michael De Prado, President and COO of NXGH. 
Mr.  Baruch has served as a director of the Bank of Jerusalem, and he served as CEO of BOS Better Online Solutions, which, under this leadership, grew  into a highly-successful company traded on NASDAQ under the symbol BOSC.  Throughout his career, he has championed  development and support of new talent in the high tech and entrepreneurial arenas. Mr. Baruch is the Chairman of Ness College, which is a leader in educating Israeli technology professionals and entrepreneurs. 
"I admire Next Group Holdings for its innovative new products and its ambitious plans," said Mr. Baruch.  "I look forward to working with the management team and helping the company achieve its goals."
Mr. Baruch also served as Chairman of the Hi-Tech and Telecom Division of the Israel Export and International Cooperation Institute, and on the board of Make-A-Wish Israel.  He currently serves as the Chairman of Or-Lachayal.   
Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) is a corporation headquartered in Miami, Florida, which, through its operating subsidiaries, engages in the business of using proprietary technology and licensed technology to provide innovative mobile banking, mobility, and telecommunications solutions to underserved, unbanked, and emerging markets. NXGH's principal executive offices are located at 1111 Brickell Avenue, Suite 2200, Miami, Florida 33131, and its telephone number at that location is (800) 611-3622.  NXGH's web address is nextgroupholdings.com. 
THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAINS "FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS", AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 27A OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, AND SECTION 21E OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED. STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE, WHICH ARE NOT PURELY HISTORICAL, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS AND INCLUDE ANY STATEMENTS REGARDING BELIEFS, PLANS, EXPECTATIONS OR INTENTIONS REGARDING THE FUTURE. EXCEPT FOR THE HISTORICAL INFORMATION PRESENTED HEREIN, MATTERS DISCUSSED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAIN FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS THAT ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES THAT COULD CAUSE ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM ANY FUTURE RESULTS, PERFORMANCE OR ACHIEVEMENTS EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED BY SUCH STATEMENTS. STATEMENTS THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, INCLUDING STATEMENTS THAT ARE PRECEDED BY, FOLLOWED BY, OR THAT INCLUDE SUCH WORDS AS"ESTIMATE", "ANTICIPATE", "BELIEVE", "PLAN" OR "EXPECT" OR SIMILAR STATEMENTS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE INCLUDE STATEMENTS RELATING TO OTHER PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION REGARDING THE COMPANY.
SOURCE  Next Group Holdings, Inc.




June 1, 2016


Next Group Holdings Rewards Shareholders with Special Dividend


By August Patterson, Senior Staff Writer, Online Media Group, Inc.
MIAMI, FL, June 1, 2016 /PRNewswire/ - Investors often take positions in companies with pending litigation, hoping that a favorable judgment will load corporate coffers and provide a boon in market valuation. On Friday, May 27, Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) put a unique spin on the pending lawsuit of plaintiffs Next Communications, Inc. (an affiliate of NXGH) and NxtGn, Inc. (a subsidiary of NXGH) versus defendant Viber Media, Inc.  
The litigation, being heard in New York Southern District Court, asserts that Viber misused confidential information that the plaintiffs communicated to Viber pursuant to a non-disclosure agreement. Publicly available documents show that on March 30, 2106, District Judge Richard J. Sullivan denied Viber's motion to dismiss on three of the four claims in the lawsuit.
In any lawsuit, the outcome is always pure speculation, but Next Group Holdings intends to share any net proceeds from a favorable ruling with its shareholders. This is being committed to through the issuance of a special dividend of newly created Class D Redeemable Preferred Stock. NXGH shareholders are eligible to receive one share of the new class of stock for each share of NXGH common stock held as of the record date of June 10, 2016. Only non-insiders of NXGH are eligible for the special dividend.
OTC Markets shows 28.78 million shares of NXGH in the public float.
"Redeemable" stock simply means that the company is going to buy the shares back. Within six months of the final resolution of the lawsuit, Next Group will redeem the Class D preferred stock at the greater of two defined prices. On the low end, should the litigation deliver an unfavorable result, the shares will be redeemed at par value, which is fixed at $0.001 per share. This means that an investor will receive $1 for every 1,000 shares held.
Should the lawsuit result in a favorable verdict for the plaintiffs, Next Group Holdings will divide up amongst special dividend shareholders 9.03% of the net proceeds (the total amount less expenses, taxes, etc.) it receives from the judgment. In a phone conversation, Michael De Prado, President and COO of Next Group Holdings, confirmed that every brokerage house where NXGH stock is held is participating in the special dividend program. 
Upon redemption of the shares, Next Group Holdings is returning the stock to the treasury for retirement, meaning there is no dilution associated with the dividend.  
An interesting point to consider with the NXGH dividend is underscored by reports from BuyIns.net, a firm regarded as an expert provider of short-sale data. A recent report from BuyIns.net states that shorts have been "aggressively shorting NXGH on a daily basis" with an average of 33.8% of daily trading volume being short selling. If naked shorting is happening, which is always difficult to prove, requiring manual certification of ownership to receive the dividend has the potential to expose the naked shorts.
To participate in the upside of a cash redemption sent directly to a shareholder, Next Group Holdings has provided guidelines for receiving the dividend, including a simple form that must be submitted to a brokerage house to verify ownership of shares.  Interested parties can learn more about the special dividend by visiting the company's website (www.nextgroupholdings.com) and by reading the official press release on the dividend provided below.
Next Group Holdings Announces Special Dividend and New Class D Redeemable Preferred Stock
MIAMI, FL, May 27, 2016 /CNW/ - Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) (the "Company") today announces a special dividend for shareholders. The Company has completed and filed requisite paperwork to issue a special dividend of one share of the new Class D Redeemable Preferred Stock for each share of NXGH common stock held. To receive the special dividend, NXGH shareholder need only to take the appropriate steps with their brokerage house to verify their position in the Company.
Next Group Holdings will redeem the Class D Redeemable Preferred shares from each shareholder subsequent to a court ruling in the litigation with Viber Media, Inc. ("Viber"). On May 12, 2016, our Board of Directors created a new class of Preferred Stock. The Board also declared a special stock dividend consisting of our newly designated Class D Redeemable Preferred Stock. Pursuant to the dividend, the special stock dividend will be distributed to owners of the Company's common stock as of the record date in a ratio of one share of Class D Redeemable Preferred Stock for every 1 share of common stock owned as of the record date. The Company has set the record date as June 10, 2016. The Class D Preferred Stock must be redeemed within six (6) months (or as soon thereafter as permitted by law) following final resolution of the Corporation's affiliates lawsuit against ViberMedia, Inc. (Next Communications, Inc. and NxtGn, Inc. v. Viber Media, Inc.) which is, as of the date of this resolution, pending in U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New York or any successor or other lawsuit relating to the subject matter thereof in which the Corporation (or any successor-in-interest) is named as a plaintiff (the "Lawsuit").
The Designation fixes the redemption price of each share of class D Preferred stock as the greater of par value or the amount obtained by dividing (a) 9.03 percent of the net proceeds to the Corporation of the Lawsuit after payment of fees and expenses incurred in connection with such law suit and the resolution of any creditor claims against Next Communications and all taxes on net income accrued or paid with respect to such amount, by (b) the total number of shares of Class D Preferred stock issued and outstanding as of the Redemption Date, which amount shall be rounded to the nearest whole cent. In the event of an unfavorable result, we will still redeem the Class D preferred stock at par within six months of the case's final disposition.
"This new dividend demonstrates the optimism we have about our future and our unwavering commitment to deliver value to our loyal shareholders," said Arik Maimon, NXGH's Chairman and CEO. "I want to personally thank each investor and encourage everyone to verify their position in NXGH with their broker immediately to receive their dividend."
Next Group Holdings has provided the stockholder letter necessary to request the Class D preferred stock certificate from the Company free of charge at www.nextgroupholdings.com under "Investors Relations" in the main menu and "Dividend" tab.
The complete 8-K regarding the dividend and new class of share filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission is available at: http://www.otcmarkets.com/edgar/GetFilingHtml?FilingID=11397857. 
About Us: NXGH is a corporation headquartered in Miami, Florida, which, through its operating subsidiaries, engages in the business of using proprietary technology and certain licensed technology to provide innovative mobile banking, mobility, and telecommunications solutions to underserved, unbanked, and emerging markets. NXGH's principal executive offices are located at 1111 Brickell Avenue, Suite 2200, Miami, Florida 33131, and its telephone number at that location is (800) 611-3622.
NXGH's web address is nextgroupholdings.com.
THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAINS "FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS", AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 27A OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, AND SECTION 21E OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED. STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE, WHICH ARE NOT PURELY HISTORICAL, ARE FORWARD- LOOKING STATEMENTS AND INCLUDE ANY STATEMENTS REGARDING BELIEFS, PLANS, EXPECTATIONS OR INTENTIONS REGARDING THE FUTURE. EXCEPT FOR THE HISTORICAL INFORMATION PRESENTED HEREIN, MATTERS DISCUSSED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAIN FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS THAT ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES THAT COULD CAUSE ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM ANY FUTURE RESULTS, PERFORMANCE OR ACHIEVEMENTS EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED BY SUCH STATEMENTS. STATEMENTS THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, INCLUDING STATEMENTS THAT ARE PRECEDED BY, FOLLOWED BY, OR THAT INCLUDE SUCH WORDS AS"ESTIMATE", "ANTICIPATE", "BELIEVE", "PLAN" OR "EXPECT" OR SIMILAR STATEMENTS ARE FORWARD- LOOKING STATEMENTS. FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE INCLUDE STATEMENTS RELATING TO OTHER PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION REGARDING THE COMPANY.
Online Media Group, Inc. is a strategic holding company. Through our brands, Online Media Group is a leading publisher of market news, commentary, proprietary research and videos from seasoned journalists, analysts and contributors covering the financial markets, specific industries and global economies. Leveraging our extensive distribution network and social media presence, we have cultivated a valuable audience of engaged market enthusiasts interested in all segments, which in turn delivers a variety of unique opportunities for industry partnerships, corporate communications and market exposure.
Legal Disclaimer: Online Media Group, Inc. is not registered with any financial or securities regulatory authority and does not provide, nor claims to provide, investment advice or recommendations to readers of this release to buy, sell or hold any securities. Investing intrinsically involves substantial risk and readers are reminded to consult an investment professional and complete their own due diligence, including SEC filings, when researching any companies mentioned in this release. This release is based upon publicly available information and, while vetted, is not considered to be all-inclusive or guaranteed to be free from errors. With respect to Section 17(B) of the Securities Act of 1933 and in the interest of full disclosure, we call the reader's attention to the fact that Online Media Group, Inc. has received compensation from the company(ies) mentioned in this release.
SOURCE  Next Group Holdings, Inc.




May 27, 2016


Next Group Holdings Announces Special Dividend and New Class D Redeemable Preferred Stock


MIAMI, FL, May 27, 2016 /CNW/ - Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) (the "Company") today announces a special dividend for shareholders. The Company has completed and filed requisite paperwork to issue a special dividend of one share of the new Class D Redeemable Preferred Stock for each share of NXGH common stock held. To receive the special dividend, NXGH shareholder need only to take the appropriate steps with their brokerage house to verify their position in the Company.
Next Group Holdings will redeem the Class D Redeemable Preferred shares from each shareholder subsequent to a court ruling in the litigation with Viber Media, Inc. ("Viber").  On May 12, 2016, our Board of Directors created a new class of Preferred Stock. The Board also declared a special stock dividend consisting of our newly designated Class D Redeemable Preferred Stock. Pursuant to the dividend, the special stock dividend will be distributed to owners of the Company's common stock as of the record date in a ratio of one share of Class D Redeemable Preferred Stock for every 1 share of common stock owned as of the record date. The Company has set the record date as June 10, 2016. The Class D Preferred Stock must be redeemed within six (6) months (or as soon thereafter as permitted by law) following final resolution of the Corporation's affiliates lawsuit against ViberMedia, Inc. (Next Communications, Inc. and NxtGn, Inc. v. Viber Media, Inc.) which is, as of the date of this resolution, pending in U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New York or any successor or other lawsuit relating to the subject matter thereof in which the Corporation (or any successor-in-interest) is named as a plaintiff (the "Lawsuit").
The Designation fixes the redemption price of each share of class D Preferred stock as the greater of par value or the amount obtained by dividing (a) 9.03 percent of the net proceeds to the Corporation of the Lawsuit after payment of fees and expenses incurred in connection with such law suit and the resolution of any creditor claims against Next Communications and all taxes on net income accrued or paid with respect to such amount, by (b) the total number of shares of Class D Preferred stock issued and outstanding as of the Redemption Date, which amount shall be rounded to the nearest whole cent. In the event of an unfavorable result, we will still redeem the Class D preferred stock at par within six months of the case's final disposition.
"This new dividend demonstrates the optimism we have about our future and our unwavering commitment to deliver value to our loyal shareholders," said Arik Maimon, NXGH's Chairman and CEO. "I want to personally thank each investor and encourage everyone to verify their position in NXGH with their broker immediately to receive their dividend."
Next Group Holdings has provided the stockholder letter necessary to request the Class D preferred stock certificate from the Company free of charge at www.nextgroupholdings.com under "Investors Relations" in the main menu and "Dividend" tab.
The complete 8-K regarding the dividend and new class of share filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission is available at: http://www.otcmarkets.com/edgar/GetFilingHtml?FilingID=11397857.
About Us: NXGH is a corporation headquartered in Miami, Florida, which, through its operating subsidiaries, engages in the business of using proprietary technology and certain licensed technology to provide innovative mobile banking, mobility, and telecommunications solutions to underserved, unbanked, and emerging markets. NXGH's principal executive offices are located at 1111 Brickell Avenue, Suite 2200, Miami, Florida 33131, and its telephone number at that location is (800) 611-3622.
NXGH's web address is nextgroupholdings.com.
THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAINS "FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS", AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 27A OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, AND SECTION 21E OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED. STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE, WHICH ARE NOT PURELY HISTORICAL, ARE FORWARD- LOOKING STATEMENTS AND INCLUDE ANY STATEMENTS REGARDING BELIEFS, PLANS, EXPECTATIONS OR INTENTIONS REGARDING THE FUTURE. EXCEPT FOR THE HISTORICAL INFORMATION PRESENTED HEREIN, MATTERS DISCUSSED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAIN FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS THAT ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES THAT COULD CAUSE ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM ANY FUTURE RESULTS, PERFORMANCE OR ACHIEVEMENTS EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED BY SUCH STATEMENTS. STATEMENTS THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, INCLUDING STATEMENTS THAT ARE PRECEDED BY, FOLLOWED BY, OR THAT INCLUDE SUCH WORDS AS"ESTIMATE", "ANTICIPATE", "BELIEVE", "PLAN" OR "EXPECT" OR SIMILAR STATEMENTS ARE FORWARD- LOOKING STATEMENTS. FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE INCLUDE STATEMENTS RELATING TO OTHER PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION REGARDING THE COMPANY.
Copyright © 2016 PR Newswire. All Rights Reserved
SOURCE  Next Group Holdings, Inc.




April 20, 2016


Next Group Holdings Announces Strategic Partnership with CP+B


Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) announced today that it has entered into a strategic partnership with Love Made Visible ("LMV"), CP+B's Product & Brand Invention Group (CP+B). They will assist NXGH's subsidiary Next CALA, Inc. ("NEXTCALA") in the design, launch and marketing of NXHG's prepaid family portfolio here at http://www.nextcala.com, along with NXGH's other subsidiary NxtGn HD video platform and telepresence products and services.
"Through our non-traditional business model, we've built an engine to generate strong valuation increases through a partnership framework that significantly mitigates risk while building irrational loyalty with our audience. We are not ad people. We are cultural change agents, brand inventors, artists, technologists, anthropologists, and everything in between. Our goal always being to disrupt conventions, not just through branding and design, but in everything we do - product development, sourcing, manufacturing & going to market. We look forward to taking a deep dive into NXGH's brands, understanding the personalities and needs of its customers and helping them connect these brands to culture in a meaningful way," said Neil Riddell, CP+B's EVP/Executive Director.
Love Made Visible has developed new agency-owned brands and partnership opportunities. These partnerships include the prospering bike-sharing system B-Cycle, the environmentally minded mechanic brand Green Garage, and the award winning spirit brands - Angel's Envy Bourbon and the Hemingway-inspired Papa's Pilar Rum. The success of these ventures has now led an expansion into other categories like lifestyle/fashion brands, natural foods, as well as the tech sector.
"Our plans to work with CP+B to disrupt the telepresence and broadcast live video landscape represents the next step in democratizing people's ability to broadcast live," said Arik Maimon, NXGH's Chairman and CEO. "We have created Intellectual Property (IP) that will put telepresence capabilities that were previously available only to Fortune 100 companies, into the hands of everyday people. This changes single point to multi-point broadcasting in a big way. It's part of what we see as an evolution from Skype (limited to 8 people), and Periscope/Meerkat (which integrates live video and texting interaction), to our platform that offers Live Video / Interactive / HD quality over very low bandwidth, and allows as many as 10,000 concurrent users a seamless interface between laptop, tablet, mobile device. With our planned technology, consumers, celebrities, politicians, and organizations will be able to publicly broadcast in HD directly to as many as 10,000 fans. Unlike our competitors' existing live video technologies, the viewers can be seen by the broadcaster and chosen to interact with by simply touching their HD video feed, creating a closer connection with their fan base."
About Us: NXGH is a corporation headquartered in Miami, Florida, which, through its operating subsidiaries, engages in the business of using proprietary technology and certain licensed technology to provide innovative mobile banking, mobility, and telecommunications solutions to underserved, unbanked, and emerging markets. NXGH's principal executive offices are located at 1111 Brickell Avenue, Suite 2200, Miami, Florida 33131, and its telephone number at that location is (800) 611-3622.
NXGH's web address is nextgroupholdings.com.
THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAINS "FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS", AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 27A OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, AND SECTION 21E OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED. STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE, WHICH ARE NOT PURELY HISTORICAL, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS AND INCLUDE ANY STATEMENTS REGARDING BELIEFS, PLANS, EXPECTATIONS OR INTENTIONS REGARDING THE FUTURE. EXCEPT FOR THE HISTORICAL INFORMATION PRESENTED HEREIN, MATTERS DISCUSSED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAIN FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS THAT ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES THAT COULD CAUSE ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM ANY FUTURE RESULTS, PERFORMANCE OR ACHIEVEMENTS EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED BY SUCH STATEMENTS. STATEMENTS THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, INCLUDING STATEMENTS THAT ARE PRECEDED BY, FOLLOWED BY, OR THAT INCLUDE SUCH WORDS AS"ESTIMATE", "ANTICIPATE", "BELIEVE", "PLAN" OR "EXPECT" OR SIMILAR STATEMENTS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE INCLUDE STATEMENTS RELATING TO OTHER PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION REGARDING THE COMPANY.
Contact:
                                             NEXT Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH)
                                             Telephone: 1-800-611-3622
info@nextgroupholdings.com 

SOURCE  Next Group Holdings, Inc.




April 14, 2016


Next Group Holdings Announces Symbol Change to NXGH


Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: NXGH) (or the "Company") announced today that its recent delay in filing the 10-Q report for the quarter ended December 31, 2015, which had been overdue but was filed on April 1, 2016, was primarily a result of problems encountered by its auditors Anton & Chia in reconciling and reclassifying certain expenditures and actions made on behalf of the beverage business which was the predecessor business of the Company, by the Company's former executives Robert Rico and Calvin Lewis, who are no longer involved in the management or operations of the Company. "Now that we have filed the 10-Q and are in compliance, and now that we are no longer forced to rely on support from prior management in order to make timely filings, we undertake to our shareholders that we will make timely filings and remain in compliance," said NXGH's Chairman and CEO Arik S. Maimon.  "We are pleased that, as one result of our recent filings and other actions, FINRA granted a symbol change effective April 11, 2016 from PLKD to NXGH.  Additionally, the listing of our shares on the OTCQB has been resumed."
About Us: NXGH is a corporation headquartered in Miami, Florida, which, through its operating subsidiaries, engages in the business of using proprietary technology and certain licensed technology to provide innovative mobile banking, mobility, and telecommunications solutions to underserved, unbanked, and emerging markets. NXGH's principal executive offices are located at 1111 Brickell Avenue, Suite 2200, Miami, Florida 33131, and its telephone number at that location is (800)611-3622.  NXGH's web address is http://www.nextgroupholdings.com.
THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAINS "FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS", AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 27A OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, AND SECTION 21E OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED. STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE, WHICH ARE NOT PURELY HISTORICAL, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS AND INCLUDE ANY STATEMENTS REGARDING BELIEFS, PLANS, EXPECTATIONS OR INTENTIONS REGARDING THE FUTURE. EXCEPT FOR THE HISTORICAL INFORMATION PRESENTED HEREIN, MATTERS DISCUSSED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAIN FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS THAT ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES THAT COULD CAUSE ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM ANY FUTURE RESULTS, PERFORMANCE OR ACHIEVEMENTS EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED BY SUCH STATEMENTS. STATEMENTS THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, INCLUDING STATEMENTS THAT ARE PRECEDED BY, FOLLOWED BY, OR THAT INCLUDE SUCH WORDS AS"ESTIMATE", "ANTICIPATE", "BELIEVE", "PLAN" OR "EXPECT" OR SIMILAR STATEMENTS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE INCLUDE STATEMENTS RELATING TO OTHER PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION REGARDING THE COMPANY.
Contact:
                                             NEXT Group Holdings, Inc.
                                             Telephone: 1-(800)611-3622
info@nextgroupholdings.com

SOURCE  Next Group Holdings, Inc.




March 11, 2016


Next Group Holdings has Entered Into an Option Agreement Allowing it to Purchase a Controlling Interest in Innovative Gaming Technologies Provider Lubar Technologies


Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTC: PLKD) announced today that, as part of its continuing efforts to maximize commercial application and usage of its NxtGn subsidiary's proprietary NxtGn AVYDA technology and its HD video network, and to accelerate revenue growth, PLKD has signed an agreement granting PLKD an exclusive option to purchase a controlling interest in Lubar Technologies, LLC.
Founded in 2002, Lubar is in the business of redefining the live gaming experience by developing and providing innovative video conferencing gaming solutions. Lubar applications allow real physical casinos located throughout the world to market their games-including blackjack, poker, roulette, and dice games, among others-to the online gaming market. Focusing on providing the best video quality, audio clarity, and usability for end users and service providers, Lubar's video conferencing gaming system transforms the way players participate in online gaming, while enabling physical casino operators profitable new services and revenue streams.
Using Lubar technology, players remotely accessing casino games from their home computers are able to see and talk with the dealer or croupier and with other players, as if they were in the casino. Using real cards, real dice, real casino equipment, and a live dealer preserves the element of randomness and enhances the experience of realism for remote gamers.
Lubar owns patents for its technology in more than 20 countries throughout the world. Information about Lubar's patents can be accessed here: http://www.lubar-tech.com/patents.html. Additional information about Lubar's products and services can be accessed here: http://www.lubar-tech.com
"If, as expected, we exercise the option," said Arik Maimon, Chairman and CEO of PLKD, "we plan to integrate certain unique features of NxtGn's proprietary AVYDA HD video technology into Lubar's products and services, making the Lubar user's experience even better."
"Deploying NxtGn AVYDA technology will give us a competitive advantage in the $30 billion per annum online gaming industry," said Yacob Rafaeli, founder and CEO of Lubar.
Under the option agreement, after completing due diligence, PLKD will have the right to acquire 78% of the membership interests in Lubar Technologies, LLC for $1,500,000, all in common shares of PLKD.  
About Us:  PLKD is a corporation headquartered in Miami, Florida, which, through its operating subsidiaries, engages in the business of using proprietary technology and certain licensed technology to provide innovative mobile banking, mobility, and telecommunications solutions to underserved, unbanked, and emerging markets. PLKD's principal executive offices are located at 1111 Brickell Avenue, Suite 2200, Miami, Florida 33131, and its telephone number at that location is (800) 611-3622.  PLKD's web address is nextgroupholdings.com.  
THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAINS "FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS", AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 27A OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, AND SECTION 21E OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED. STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE, WHICH ARE NOT PURELY HISTORICAL, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS AND INCLUDE ANY STATEMENTS REGARDING BELIEFS, PLANS, EXPECTATIONS OR INTENTIONS REGARDING THE FUTURE. EXCEPT FOR THE HISTORICAL INFORMATION PRESENTED HEREIN, MATTERS DISCUSSED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAIN FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS THAT ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES THAT COULD CAUSE ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM ANY FUTURE RESULTS, PERFORMANCE OR ACHIEVEMENTS EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED BY SUCH STATEMENTS. STATEMENTS THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, INCLUDING STATEMENTS THAT ARE PRECEDED BY, FOLLOWED BY, OR THAT INCLUDE SUCH WORDS AS"ESTIMATE", "ANTICIPATE", "BELIEVE", "PLAN" OR "EXPECT" OR SIMILAR STATEMENTS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE INCLUDE STATEMENTS RELATING TO OTHER PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION REGARDING THE COMPANY.
Contact:
                                             Next Group Holdings, Inc.
                                             Telephone:
                                             +1-800-611-3622
info@pleasantkids.com
 
SOURCE  Next Group Holdings, Inc.




February 19, 2016


Next Group Holdings Announces Plans to Extend its Reach in the Mobile HD Video Market


Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: PLKD) announced today that it plans to aggressively extend its market reach and subscriber base in the mobile HD video space throughout the remainder of 2016, through its subsidiary NxtGn, Inc.
NxtGn plans to launch its AVYDA Powered by Telarix mobile application for iOS devices in April 2016. The AVYDA cloud platform will allow from two people to thousands of people located all over the earth to simultaneously join video rooms to connect with friends, family members, celebrities, live entertainment events, doctors, classrooms, and more. With a heavy focus on user experience, the application will be simple to use: just click on an access link or notification to connect. The platform allows carrier service providers to monetize HD video communication, changing the landscape of how subscribers communicate with one another.
"We are very happy to see that 5 years of research and development, and relationship building, are about to make our unique new HD video platform a reality for millions of people around the world," said Michael De Prado, PLKD's President.
Mr. De Prado continued, "as our sister company NxtGn, Inc. begins to roll out several exciting new products and services, the Next CALA Rewards program will offer Next CALA subscribers the ability to use NxtGn's proprietary HD Personal Telepresence products to participate in health care consultations, distance learning, and exclusive live entertainment events. I am proud that Next CALA Rewards will soon allow our subscribers to use HD telepresence services that until recently were within reach only of Fortune 500 companies and very high net worth individuals. I believe these synergies will give both Avyda and our Next CALA Prepaid Visa cards sustainable competitive advantages in the marketplace."
About Us:  PLKD is a corporation headquartered in Miami, Florida, which, through its operating subsidiaries, engages in the business of using proprietary technology and certain licensed technology to provide innovative mobile banking, mobility, and telecommunications solutions to underserved, unbanked, and emerging markets. PLKD's principal executive offices are located at 1111 Brickell Avenue, Suite 2200, Miami, Florida 33131, and its telephone number at that location is (800) 611-3622.  PLKD's web address is nextgroupholdings.com.  
THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAINS "FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS", AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 27A OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, AND SECTION 21E OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED. STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE, WHICH ARE NOT PURELY HISTORICAL, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS AND INCLUDE ANY STATEMENTS REGARDING BELIEFS, PLANS, EXPECTATIONS OR INTENTIONS REGARDING THE FUTURE. EXCEPT FOR THE HISTORICAL INFORMATION PRESENTED HEREIN, MATTERS DISCUSSED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAIN FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS THAT ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES THAT COULD CAUSE ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM ANY FUTURE RESULTS, PERFORMANCE OR ACHIEVEMENTS EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED BY SUCH STATEMENTS. STATEMENTS THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, INCLUDING STATEMENTS THAT ARE PRECEDED BY, FOLLOWED BY, OR THAT INCLUDE SUCH WORDS AS"ESTIMATE", "ANTICIPATE", "BELIEVE", "PLAN" OR "EXPECT" OR SIMILAR STATEMENTS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE INCLUDE STATEMENTS RELATING TO OTHER PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION REGARDING THE COMPANY.

                                             Contact:
                                             Next Group Holdings, Inc.
                                             Telephone: +1-800-611-3622
info@pleasantkids.com 





 February 10, 2016


Next Group Holdings Announces Schedule for Release of NEXTCALA Mobile Apps


Next Group Holdings, Inc. (OTCQB: PLKD) announced today that it plans to release its NEXTCALA mobile applications for both Android and iOS in April 2016, through its subsidiary Next CALA, Inc. ("Next CALA") in partnership with InComm. PLKD owns 94% of the issued and outstanding shares of Next CALA, which is one of PLKD's four operating subsidiaries.
Next CALA promotes and distributes NextCALA-branded Prepaid Visa® General Purpose Reloadable ("GPR") prepaid cards, bearing the Next CALA Debit™ and Visa® logos. Next CALA Prepaid Card® GPR cards are provided under licensing and operating agreements with prepaid industry-leaders IHFL and ITCFL, which are affiliated corporations and each of which is indirectly a wholly-owned subsidiary of InComm Holdings, Inc. and The Bancorp Bank pursuant to a license from Visa USA, Inc.  The Bancorp Bank is a member of the FDIC.  The Next CALA Prepaid Visa® GPR cards are distributed and serviced for Next CALA by ITC Financial Licenses, Inc.
Customers can load between $20 and $500 per load into their Next CALA Prepaid Visa® GPR cards anywhere in the Vanilla Reload Network Nationwide, which includes more than 50,000 retail locations in the United States, including most Walmart, Walgreens, CVS, Dollar General, and 7-Eleven stores, and anywhere in the Mio Worldwide Network, which includes more than 450,000 locations throughout the world. Customers can also load cash value into their Next CALA Prepaid Visa® cards via automated bank-to-bank direct deposit. Next CALA Prepaid Visa® cards are accepted wherever Visa Debit® cards are accepted, and can be used for transactions including ATM withdrawals and other ATM functions, remittances, bill payments, mobile-banking, virtual digital wallet functions, and purchasing at retail locations, online, and over the phone, as well as ACH Direct Deposit. The maximum load amount permitted per registered Next CALA Prepaid Visa® card is $10,000. Each Next CALA Prepaid Visa® GPR card comes with a routing number and unique account number, is FDIC insured, and can be used anywhere the Visa® logo is accepted.
The NEXTCALA mobile application will give users access to mobile banking and banking services 24 hours per day, 365 days per year. Users will be able to make mobile to mobile payments, transfer funds to family and friends, and see all balances and transactions through the application. Users will not only have an easy way to do banking they will also earn points that can be redeemed towards long distance calls either via voice or HD Video among other benefits via NEXTCALA Rewards program.
About Us:  PLKD is a corporation headquartered in Miami, Florida, which, through its operating subsidiaries, engages in the business of using proprietary technology and certain licensed technology to provide innovative mobile banking, mobility, and telecommunications solutions to underserved, unbanked, and emerging markets. PLKD's principal executive offices are located at 1111 Brickell Avenue, Suite 2200, Miami, Florida 33131, and its telephone number at that location is (800) 611-3622.  PLKD's web address is nextgroupholdings.com.  
THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAINS "FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS", AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 27A OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES ACT OF 1933, AS AMENDED, AND SECTION 21E OF THE UNITED STATES SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED. STATEMENTS IN THIS NEWS RELEASE, WHICH ARE NOT PURELY HISTORICAL, ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS AND INCLUDE ANY STATEMENTS REGARDING BELIEFS, PLANS, EXPECTATIONS OR INTENTIONS REGARDING THE FUTURE. EXCEPT FOR THE HISTORICAL INFORMATION PRESENTED HEREIN, MATTERS DISCUSSED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE CONTAIN FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS THAT ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN RISKS AND UNCERTAINTIES THAT COULD CAUSE ACTUAL RESULTS TO DIFFER MATERIALLY FROM ANY FUTURE RESULTS, PERFORMANCE OR ACHIEVEMENTS EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED BY SUCH STATEMENTS. STATEMENTS THAT ARE NOT HISTORICAL FACTS, INCLUDING STATEMENTS THAT ARE PRECEDED BY, FOLLOWED BY, OR THAT INCLUDE SUCH WORDS AS"ESTIMATE", "ANTICIPATE", "BELIEVE", "PLAN" OR "EXPECT" OR SIMILAR STATEMENTS ARE FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS. FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS CONTAINED IN THIS NEWS RELEASE INCLUDE STATEMENTS RELATING TO OTHER PUBLICLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION REGARDING THE COMPANY.
Contact:
                                             NEXT Group Holdings, Inc.
                                             Telephone:
                                             +1-800-611-3622
info@pleasantkids.com

SOURCE  Next Group Holdings, Inc.
















Board Of Directors.






Arik Maimon
Founder, Chairman & CEO








Michael De Prado
Founder, President & COO







Adiv Baruch
Board Director








Natali Dadon
Board Director














GET YOUR NEXTCALA CARD TODAY!
 REGISTER NOW
The NEXTCALA Visa® Prepaid Card is issued by the Bancorp Bank pursuant to a license from Visa U.S.A. Inc. and can be used wherever Visa debit cards are accepted. The Bancorp Bank Member FDIC.
											The NEXTCALA Prepaid Card is distributed and serviced by InComm Financial Services, Inc., which is licensed as a Money Transmitter by the New York State Department of Financial Services. 




















    
	VIX Index
   


















































*Third Party Advertisement

 












CLICK HERE TO LEARN MORE ABOUT THE CBOE + BATS INTEGRATION - C2 MIGRATION TIMELINE AVAILABLE




CBOE C2
CBOE Futures Exchange
CBOE Permit Holders
Livevol
Search



Login / Register




My Account
                                


Account Settings
                                        


Sign Out
                                        















TAP TO LEARN MORE ABOUT THE CBOE + BATS INTEGRATION - C2 MIGRATION TIMELINE AVAILABLE


CBOEExecute Success



Search

















CBOE
ProductsProducts MainVIX® Index & VolatilityStock Index Options - SPX-RUT-MSCI-FTSEOptions on Single Stocks and Exchange Traded ProductsMini OptionsWeeklysSM OptionsEnd-of-Month & Quarterly OptionsFLEX/CFLEXStrategy Benchmark IndexesSocial Media IndexesContract Specs and Trading HoursTrader Incentive ProgramsVIX® Index & VolatilityVIX® Index & VolatilityVolatility IndexesVIX Options and FuturesVolatility on Stock IndexesVolatility on Individual EquitiesVolatility on ETFsVolatility on Interest RatesVolatility on CurrenciesVolatility IndicatorsVIX-Related Strategy BenchmarksVIX Options and FuturesVIX Options and FuturesVIX IndexVIX OptionsVIX FuturesVIX Price ChartsVIX WeeklysVIX Binary OptionsVIX IndexVIX IndexThe Relationship of the SPX and the VIX IndexVIX Historical DataPrice Charts on VIXThe VIX Index CalculationVIX FAQs













CBOE Volatility Index® (VIX®)

























VIX













SPX
2472.97
-4.60


VIX
10.35
0.07






32VX/Q7
10.75
0.05


VIX/Q7
11.35
0.08


34VX/Q7
11.90
0.00







Delayed Quotes


Prices for 3 VIX
Futures are above








The CBOE Volatility Index® (VIX® Index®) is a key measure of market expectations of near-term volatility conveyed by S&P 500 stock index option prices. Since its introduction in 1993, the VIX Index has been considered by many to be the world's premier barometer of investor sentiment and market volatility. Several investors expressed interest in trading instruments related to the market's expectation of future volatility, and so VX futures were introduced in 2004, and VIX options were introduced in 2006.Options and futures on volatility indexes are available for investors who wish to explore the use of instruments that might have the potential to diversify portfolios in times of market stress.Please visit the links on this page to explore how you could use VIX-related products in the management of your investment portfolio.






Related Links
        

Products Main
Learn By Product
Volatility Strategies
Volatility Price Charts
Bats ETF Marketplace
Volatility Bibliography
VIX Index IOSCO Statement
VIX Index Complaints
Uncover Powerful Outcomes







*Third Party Advertisement










Special Offers
     
*Third Party Advertisements






            thinkorswim trade w/ advanced trading tools. Open an account and get up to $600! 
          






            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






            Trade free for 60 days on thinkorswim from TD Ameritrade.
 




            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






           New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 










*Third Party Advertisement













 



*Third Party Advertisement



*Third Party Advertisement




































  

 




Slimware Utilities - Free Software to Clean, Optimize & Update Your PC!












































|
Login
|
Register







Home
Download

SlimCleaner Free
SlimDrivers Free
DriverUpdate
SlimCleaner Plus
Slimware Wallpapers


Ratings
Company


Who We Are
Join Our Team
Contact us
Link To Us


Contact
Pressroom

Slimware in the News
Press   Releases
Media Resources 
Link To Us


Forum















Clean Your PCwith SlimCleaner 4.0 (Free)
 SlimCleaner uses social networking and community feedback to speed up, clean and optimize your PC!
Download Now

Learn More 








Update Device Driverswith SlimDrivers 2.2 (Free)SlimDrivers is the world's first software to automatically update PC drivers using cloud technology for FREE!
Download Now

Learn More







 Why SlimCleaner?
See how it works with community feedback...
Watch Now









Downloads  
Most  Rated Software
Most  Rated Startups
Top Rated Users




SlimCleaner Free
Clean & optimize your PC with a crowd-sourced approach.



Remove Junk Files
Speed Up PC 
Improve Performance



More Info



SlimDrivers Free
Crowd-sourcing to spider and aggregate millions of devices.



Update Device Drivers
Fix Broken Drivers
Find Outdated Drivers



More Info








  Rating
  Item
 Description



Bing Bar
  This toolbar includes shortcuts to the Bing Internet search engine and...



Ask Toolbar
 This toolbar is installed under the address bar and includes shortcuts...



Cyberlink PowerDVD
CyberLink PowerDVD is a universal media player for viewing DVD's and oth...



Adobe Flash Player
 This plug-in allows enhanced web viewing by providing support for viewi...



Mozilla Firefox
 Mozilla Firefox is an open-source web browser that blocks pop-ups and d...



PhotoScape
This is an image editing application which offers several features to us...



Bonjour
Bonjour (formerly called Rendezvous) implements Zeroconf, a service disc...


 View More








  Rating
  Item
 Description



QueueReporting
This process sends errors to Microsoft for evaluation.



LPRemove
This entry uninstalls language packs that are not needed on your system...



Proxy
Collects data from the user if opted-in for the Microsoft Customer Exper...



GoogleUpdate TaskMac...
Automatically checks for, downloads and installs updates for Google soft...



Adobe ARM
Automatically checks for, downloads and installs updates for Adobe.



SR
Provides for the System Restore function.



QuickTime Task
Produces a system tray icon allowing quick access to QuickTime.



View More








    
 User
Recently Rated
  Rating



Nazar
Mozilla Firefox 32.0.2 (x86 uk)




Phonevisit
tcpip\parameters\interfaces\{5bd7d26b-93a9-4430-a02e-ae47531257a1}\183.182.100.1 183.182.100.2




Ronald Seekings
mpksl3fa53b31




DocScotty
MSC




Soenasti
Java Quick Starter (JavaQuickStarterService) - Sun Microsystems, Inc.




stef11
NCPluginUpdater




alex12
Удаление локализатора



View More







Recent Activity
        




nuranthrim	rated "Brutal Legend versio..." (Software) OPTIONAL.    "You should keep Brutal Legend version 1 installed if you like a metal oriented game" 




cperivolaris	rated "Google Toolbar" (Toolbar) GOOD.    




Ryan	rated "EvernoteClipper.lnk" (Startup) GOOD.    "You should keep EvernoteClipper.lnk in startup because it automatically launches Evernote at Windows startup." 




imortalvt	rated "Shockwave Flash Obje..." (Item) GOOD.    




BSwaggS69	rated "Civilization 5" (Software) GOOD.    "You should keep Civilization 5 installed because its a fun video game" 




cyberjoyce	rated "Locked" (Toolbar) OPTIONAL.    




David Moats 	rated "GoogleChromeAutoLaun..." (Startup) GOOD.    




Terryalexa	rated "Joystick Plug-in" (Item) GOOD.    "You should keep Joystick Plug-in because it's used for google flight simulator online." 




AceEleven	rated "Acer Crystal Eye Web..." (Software) GOOD.    




KeenJeffrey	rated "RoboForm" (Toolbar) GOOD.    "You should keep &RoboForm Toolbar because it keeps my p***words and bookmarks safe and protected" 




chocobear13	rated "Pokki" (Startup) OPTIONAL.    "You should keep Pokki in startup if you rely on the win8 desktop setup and can live with the obscene amounts of energy it consta... 




thelightbar	rated "MyMusicCloud" (Item) GOOD.    "You should keep MyMusicCloud because non threatning and useful." 






News & Updates







Recent Awards & Recognition
























View More
 
Recently Rated Items 


  Rating 
 Item



VLC media player 1.0.1



Shockwave ActiveX Control



WinRAR archiver



WUWebControl Class



PCPitstop Utility



PCPitstop AntiVirus



mhLabel Class



MUWebControl Class



QuickTime Object



Shockwave ActiveX Control



MUCatalogWebControl Class



Motorola Connect



DellSystemDetect



Enable RDP Client.lnk



RecordingRestart



Microsoft-Windows-DiskDiagnost...


View More








Home
Downloads
Company
Contact us
Press Room
EULA
Privacy Policy
Terms Of Use







Microsoft is a trademark of the Microsoft group of companies. All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners 















    
	Online Courses
   


















































*Third Party Advertisement

 












CLICK HERE TO LEARN MORE ABOUT THE CBOE + BATS INTEGRATION - C2 MIGRATION TIMELINE AVAILABLE




CBOE C2
CBOE Futures Exchange
CBOE Permit Holders
Livevol
Search



Login / Register




My Account
                                


Account Settings
                                        


Sign Out
                                        















TAP TO LEARN MORE ABOUT THE CBOE + BATS INTEGRATION - C2 MIGRATION TIMELINE AVAILABLE


CBOEExecute Success



Search

















CBOE
EducationThe Options InstituteGetting StartedOnline CoursesSeminarsWebcastsEducation for ProfessionalsAsk the InstituteEducational ToursOptionQuest Online GameEducational ToolsOnline Courses Online CoursesRegister/LoginExamsCourse FAQs













Online Courses


















Your Education Snapshot:

Login
Log Out





Current level: 
                    0%









Next Steps:




Login / Register


Take Assessment






View Transcripts


Take Assessment


Access Your Courses







View Resources


By Education Level


View Calendar


Programs at The Options Institute











Expand Your Options!
Thank you for choosing this opportunity to take your options education to the next level. Whether you are new to investing or are a seasoned professional, using options can be an efficient and easy way to protect the profits you have made, limit your loss, gain additional income or secure a specific stock price. 
The Options Institute's online courses are designed to help every level of investor gain a fuller understanding of the uses of listed options. Complete the courses you feel would be most suitable for building your knowledge and confidence in using listed options.

                    Please select from the links below to view detailed information regarding each course. Then, follow the instructions listed below to enroll in any of the our online courses:





Basic Level Courses:
                    



Options Warm-up:The Language of Options and Options' Mechanics
Description

Fundamentals of Equity Options: Basic terminology, characteristics and concepts of equity options.
Description

Fundamentals of Index Options: Basic terminology, characteristics and concepts of index options.
Description

Fundamentals of CBOE Index Products: The characteristics of CBOE Indexes and related products. Learn about the OEX, SPX, VIX and NDX.
Description

Introduction to Options Basics: Basic options concepts and terminology.
Description

Profit and Loss Diagrams: Teach yourself options strategies using P & L diagrams.
Description

Investment Strategies: Options strategies for investment purposes.
Description

Covered Call Writing: The basics of Covered Call Writing including assignment, tax implications and the Buy/Write strategy.
Description





Intermediate Level Courses:
                    



Index Options: This lesson introduces ways of using CBOE Index Options for investing conservatively and protecting a portfolio.
Description

Index Options and the Dow Jones: This lesson presents conservative ways of investing in options based on the Dow Jones Industrial Average (DJX).
Description

Option Price Behavior: This lesson covers volatility, delta, time decay and implied volatility.
Description

Trading Strategies: Topics covered include leverage, covered straddle, stock repair, LEAPS&reg and buying calls and puts.
Description




 
Advanced Level Courses:
                    



Managing Stock Positions: Strategies for managing long stock positions. Various situations are presented along with a number of possible forecasts for the underlying stock, and strategies that best fit each forecast.
Description

Managing Option Positions: Strategies that allow you to manage, or take follow-up action, to protect unrealized profits, or to help eliminate or reduce accrued losses on your option positions.
Description

Trading Volatility: Various strategies including Long and Short Straddles, Long and Short Strangles, Butterflies, and Condors. The profit and loss potential of each strategy is examined as well as how each is related to volatility. 
Description




 
Spreading Courses:
                    



Spreading I: An introduction to using spreads, including an overview of the four Vertical Spreads: Bull Call Spreads, Bear Put Spreads, Bear Call Spreads and Bull Put Spreads. 
Description

Spreading II: An overview of spreads that are utilized in very specific market conditions, such as: Ratio Spreads, Backspreads and Time Spreads.
Description

Basics of Spreading: Vertical Spreads: Detailed explanations, along with examples of Vertical Spreads.
Description

Basics of Spreading: Ratio and Backspreads: Detailed explanations, along with examples of Ratio and Backspreads.
Description

Basics of Spreading: Time Spreads: Detailed explanations, along with examples of Time Spreads.
Description

Basics of Spreading: Straddles and Strangles: Detailed explanations, along with examples of Straddles and Strangles.
Description

Basics of Spreading: Butterflies and Condors: Detailed explanations, along with examples of Butterflies and Condors.
Description







How to Register:
Step 1: Log into your MyCBOE account.



Step 2: Enter Registration Code
Please click here and enter optedu if prompted. 
If you are taken directly to your Course Status Page, please scroll to the bottom for your Current Registration code. Please click on Change Registration code if it is NOT                    optedu



Step 3: Complete a Student Profile
Complete the student profile page and click on the submit button. 



Step 4: Select your Courses
You should now be on your personalized Course Status Page which will list all of our available courses. To register, simply select the course name link.
 Contact Us:
Click here to send us an e-mail.











Related Links
        


Introduction to CBOE Volatility Products
Virtual Trade Tool 
Options Calculator
Symbol Directory
Delayed Quotes
Uncover Powerful Outcomes







*Third Party Advertisement










Special Offers
     
*Third Party Advertisements






            thinkorswim trade w/ advanced trading tools. Open an account and get up to $600! 
          






            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






            Trade free for 60 days on thinkorswim from TD Ameritrade.
 




            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






           New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 






            New TradeStation Pricing. $5/Trade + $0.50 Per Contract for Options. Open an Account. 










*Third Party Advertisement













 



*Third Party Advertisement



*Third Party Advertisement




































  

 
